I took some lovely vintage linens and used them regularly, but as they began to wear, I put them away to save.
Yet again I have managed to neglect you, my dear readers. I promised you lots of things, a movie, a lot of interviews, but I managed to do none of these. The movie, or lack thereof, I could probably blame on technology, but I wish to take full responsibility for my shortcomings. For this I am sorry, but I will more-or-less make it up to you in this post. Yes, you read that right: this post. I will stuff this post full of pictures, impressions and stories. So pay attention and be patient!
When I worked for the Federation of City Farms I was based at Gorgie City Farm so I know the farm and its animals well, though I admit to a certain bias towards the rabbits (and Dexter, who you see in the photo!) I’m delighted to be back at the farm to facilitate this workshop! And if it's successful, it may become a regular seasonal event!
And finally – for this mildly surreal Sunday evening… another story involving our illustrious profession. The BBC reports: “A senior Aberdeenshire lawyer has appeared in court charged with damaging 11 cars following a party at a golf club in Perthshire. Paul Hutcheson tore windscreen wipers from parked cars, causing nearly £1,000 of damage on his way home from his mother’s 80th birthday celebrations.”
Who can resist an epic poem in which the protagonist gets shipwrecked, hides in a harem (and then is chosen by the sultan for an evening of pleasure), has a fling with Catherine the Great, and endless other romps—all narrated in Byron’s slouchy, sinuous poetry?
‘Might stop you getting a cold – I’d invite you back but Frank says no. Won’t hear of it after that last row he had with Herman.’
In the meantime, I managed to find the Gail Pan Flowerdale pattern in the UK, thanks to Gail Pan letting me know who stocks them.
The interesting implication, we can investigate is what psychological needs are addressed here, why do we need this or that form of sacrum. It is only a trick to say: now we are past the medieval ages, now we know what the world is made of. Yet we haven’t overcome our own thinking and we never will. Here is a reminder. Be critical, with special emphasis on not being overly rational. The modern world is too complex to think we already know how to deal with it. The 400 years old manner of questioning it is not valid anymore. By definition the traps are in places that we don’t expect. We’ve already fallen deep inside, but our duty is to try climbing a little bit higher. At least high enough to see the light.
Thank you so much to everyone who has clicked those “Like” and “Follow” buttons! I appreciate all of you so much!
We learnt about how to colour the icing, make all the different shaped decorations, pipe icing onto the cakes… basically everything that’s on top of the cakes was made from scratch. We started off with just rough balls of white icing and it all started from there. It was a lovely relaxing break from the real world and I was totally engrossed in creating my little cake accessories!
Miss Adorable
Russian Imperial Stout has been my favorite beer for a while, although it's starting to be overtaken by pilsners, for some reason. That's the beer equivalent of switching from pro-life religious Republican to pro-choice athiest Democrat. But it is what it is...
This is why job formation has slowed of late. ADP estimates that April private payrolls will rise by only 119,000 in what would be significant monthly slowing vs. a revised 201,000 in March. This compares to Bureau of Labor Statistics’ estimates of 121,000 for private payrolls and 120,000 for total payrolls in Friday’s upcoming unemployment report for April. But remember that the BLS’s JOLTS report shows 3.5million job openings, and growing.
Some day I would like to get one of these, and when you see the prices you’ll understand why I’m not the proud owner of one.
Which is a good thing, as every small business owner
What I would like to do now is to invite you to visit, and then hopefully join, the happenings of East Coast Insomnia. It truly is the rawest version of myself that I can give right now.
Allan: Brother John’s disability transformed him, causing him to change the focus of his career to accessibility… and in doing so transformed accessibility. John, you are responsible for bringing many to the calling, many who did not yet know accessibility would be a focus of their work. Having embraced them, you sent them on their way to add their voice to the call for an accessible world.
And he goes on to make a broader point:
My first thought was the one about staying home on Friday the 13th since traffic may be a bit lighter that day. But I do love making a birthday wish! Also I'll pick up a heads-up penny that I find outside, for good luck. If people are around I may not do it, but it feels weird to pass it by.
CONCLUSION: A better than average comedy with an *incredible* cast.
With a little of the Aztec gold powder from the lid on your finger rub the gold powder in to the four corners of the black textured square. Leaving the center of the square free of powders. Put the powder only on the top of the black square and keep it away from the sides of the square too, we are going to place a twisted coil around the square.
Perfect.
299Fresh blooming hope, gay daughter of the sky!
Paulaner Oktoberfest
The tone of this site will change somewhat as now I feel the need to write for myself and I can’t promise regular posts. What I can promise is I will always write with the Spirit.
I'm also showing these adorable blocks and spool made by my friend Kim from Shabby, Pink and Pretty! They sit on the counter space of my built in hutch.
They’re quite tasty – and honestly coming from the standpoint of not being one who likes liquor or mixed drinks so much – they’re pretty dang good! Of course I love the outer chocolate shell, but on the inside is a delicious flavored marshmallow crème that has the mixed drink flavor. None of the boozy bunnies were over powering or weird tasting – They just tasted good :) I shared them with a friend and she liked them a lot too!
Bevin
People (a.k.a. prospects, customers and employees) want to be part of something greater than themselves. Be sure that you share your business vision statement (what your business will ultimately become by fulfilling its mission; and the greater good it will provide to its constituents when it is “all grown up.”) Talk about the changes you foresee to your organization and its structure, and the opportunities that exists for employees in the short and in the long run.
“new and living way” (as opposed to the old and dead way) brings many sons to glory, i.e. the violent death reserved for criminals set those criminals-turned-sons free because it was leveled against the righteous Son.
Thinking, she looked up to the sky, where a flock of birds blazed a path almost as rapid as hers. “As many times as there are birds in the sky,” she said.
We can’t have love so we talk a lot about love. We talk about our ideals and dream guys. Everyone is very different so we get really excited saying “Eh!? Really!?” (laughs) The most maiden-like is CL. She likes to cook and she also has the desire to marry.
* This is great for people who like to sell and trade their diapers and want to keep track of what they have
Element Bracelets are mostly notable today as Cognizance bracelets.
Coca-Cola have harnessed this idea, and have made huggable vending machines. I don’t drink fizzy drinks much, but if I could literally hug a machine and have it poop out a can of that good stuff, I’d be all over it like a bad rash.
You can consolidate a series of articles of a similar theme and package them as a report or listing of information. While you may think that anyone can do this, you'd be surprised how little of this is done.
President Obama is in Afghanistan where he met with Afghan President Hamid Karzai and signed a strategic partnership agreement. He also delivered a speech on his military plans for Afghanistan. Watch clips from the speech.
The manager of the safari camp tells me the name of the latest celebrity he wants to invite to the Congo for a free holiday.
1 Kings 21:25
And Hogwarts Castle was at peace once more
Let me back it up a little. When I started to date on-line, I used Craigslist.* I have absolutely no tolerance for stupid people who don't know the difference between there, their and they're, so when I saw an ad that was written in proper English, with proper punctuation I kinda got a little excited and reached out to this person. He was a small business tax accountant. We emailed for a bit making small talk until he finally asked me out on a date a couple of days later. I didn't expect him to bust out reservations to one of the fanciest places in town - and that is exactly what he did! To say that I was impressed was an understatement. Maybe I ended up roping the mother load!!!
Erkkola R. The physical work capacity of the expectant mother and its effect on pregnancy, labour, and the newborn. Internat J Obstetrics and Gynaecology 1976; 14: 153-159.
It is not something Marxists like to address in today’s world, because there is a feeling that some nice solution has to be found for every problem in the world. Even more, to raise the idea that a people should not be entitled to nationhood, to self-determination is one that is anathema to socialists that have imbibed the notions of petit-bourgeois democracy of the type that leads to idiot anti-imperialism. In order to understand the argument, it is necessary to reach back in time, beyond the discussions of the National Question, by the Comintern, back into the 19th century, when these issues were discussed by Marx and Engels,
This beautifully illustrated picture books shows Dumont in his dirigible ‘floating over Paris’ , the town of his adult years. The illustrations show movement from looking out of the dirigible, unique I thought as though we ourselves are flying.
the extreme exploitation of labour (alongside the duty free plants of Japan, Taiwan, US etc in the Special Economic Zones) and clever adoption of new technology, which is now being invested in the classic manner of the European and American imperialists before it in Asia, Africa and Latin America, to plunder the resources of the colonial and semi-colonial (and of course rival EU, Australian and US imperialist) economies to extract
*Zizou, aka my friend and traveling companion, not Zinedine Zidane.
“I feel like I am in a classroom full of missionaries teaching me personally. It’s like their pages are dripping with blood, sweat, and Scripture–and I can feel and taste their passion for what they do.”
Something I wanted to mention about when I contacted our life insurance agent to tell him that Rob had died, was that I can’t tell you how many people incorrectly told me there would be no life insurance as it was a suicide and suicides are not covered. This wasn’t just from anyone, it came from highly educated, successful professionals and it just pissed me off because they were all so adamant, but all so wrong.
And two squads will make their debuts in the series using Toyota's Avensis model.
Are you starting to get it? In the opening of the book of Acts we find a group of leaders that obsess over Jesus and an out of control, unplanned, unstructured movement of people form around them (the first church) because they too fall obsessively in love with Jesus.
One thing I’ve noticed about Rick Riordan is that he does his best writing in the first person. This is sometimes cumbersome for a writer, because you can’t change scenes quickly; you’ve got one POV and one POV only. This takes away much of the fun in books, I’ve found, though he does a great job making up for it. And the multiple POV writing style means the reader can choose which character he/she likes best, instead of having only one protagonist to love. With that, it feels like treason almost to love Vlad the Inhaler (from Throne of Fire), who isn’t really a lovable creature anyway, but his name is awesome.
She had her party at Metro Gymnastics this year. Everyone had so much fun!
Did you add answers to frequently asked questions (FAQ) to your website? Share them with all your customers in an upcoming email newsletter or plan to rotate the 12 most frequently asked questions on signs at your point of sale or use your FAQ as the starting point for blog posts and social media interaction.
"Oh, yeah. That's right. My daughter."
There will be weeks when I do not hit all my workouts that are on the plan. That is ok. I will make adjustments as necessary, and that is exactly why I chose to have a coach this time. I was lucky enough to find a free coach (no way can I afford one right now!) and my main goal is to have help establishing the right training plan for me and helping make adjustments during training if needed.
sparrow wrap ring - $10
“Why?” she answered.
He compiled several international studies comparing vegetarians and nonvegetarians consumers, involving a total of 76,000 volunteers. If on one hand the data indicated that vegetarians had less myocardial problems, but it was found that the risk for colon cancer was equal to that of non-vegetarians. But is that all other studies that pointed to red meat as a carcinogen were wrong? The French oncologist checked the details. In fact, one problem was the raw material base. 3.5 Oz. (100 gr.) steak U.S. beef has 300 calories, and if it is of European origin has only 150 on average. The steak in Europe is 28% protein on average and U.S. 16%. But the biggest difference lies in the lipids (fats): 4% for Europe and 24.9% for the U.S.
Chef: Or chains.
there with me when he sang
6) Ply until the bobbin is full; break the ends off, wrap them back around their own core, and tuck their ends in (see #2 for why).
no shit. when will i ever learn that haircuts are just not meant for me! the last hair revamp i had which i actually did not hate, was in 2007. two effing whole years ago, when i cut it chin-length … and when i made sure they did absolutely nothing to my fringe. and don’t tell me my hair is fine. it is not fine. my fringe is horrendous.
“Russell T Davies has left a fantastic legacy – Doctor Who was dead and buried when he started and nobody was interested in it.
Then it dawned on me that maybe I could do more than give her $30 and hope someone else gives her another $30 so the young family can find a place to sleep tonight. I asked her if we could share her photos and her story so that somewhere, some of you might be able to help.
Detail shot of doily / sentiment label:
I am definitely going to do this for the 1950′s when I get to them, and will put the list in poll form for next time.
(B) incoherent
Me (rubbing my face): Yeah, really.
I mentioned in my last post that we didn’t get to see our granddaughters play softball because of the Texas weather wouldn’t cooperate. We knew before we got to Houston that the outlook wasn’t very favorable, but we weren’t prepared for Texas weather.
we were told not to worry.
This beautiful, traditional East End pub was fire-bombed by an Asian gang in 2003 and some staff were injured. Two weeks later the landlady was threatened with a replica gun in Brick Lane by Asians and warned: 'You don't belong round here'. She stood her ground and told them to shoot if they were going to. The Bangla gang ran off.
-I didn't get up out of bed while Baby Hippo took his nap and the twins were supposedly watching a movie when I heard one twin playing the piano. I knew this was a bad sign because it meant that he was no longer interested in the movie and would soon be getting into mischief.
CHAPMAN GB, COUPS EJ. Time preferences and preventive health behaviour: acceptance of the influenza vaccine. Med Decis Making 1999; 19: 307-314.
Jesus told parables. He told stories that had meaning and connection to the everyday lives of the people who heard those stories. We do well, when we interpret the parables, to first listen to the parables. We do well to pay attention to the context of the parables. We do well to hear first the story of earth before we presume to know and attach meaning of heaven to the word of God. These are not earthly stories with heavenly meanings. They are carefully told earthy stories designed to capture our attention, involve us in a conversation with Jesus, and seek him and his kingdom first. In part two of this post, I will explore the parable itself and de-sanitize it.
Yes, he said, but they are all Taiwanese and I don't like Taiwanese men. I can't stand them they turn me off. I want a white boyfriend.
(My posting for The (Late) Session will be in a few days by the way.)
What are you?
"Take a number and step aside. She's only one person and she's got four real babies in real life to take care of, besides us imaginary ones." Angelica waves them off. "Don't worry. You'll get used to stopping and starting. Go play the pinball machine or something. A final check before hitting send doesn't usually take her long, unless she trowels up a rotton potato. Just be thankful she hasn't bumped you off for a new story."
Is it easy to spot an expert paid by the drug companies? The answer is yes, the ones who claim that plants have no benefits to health whilst the drugs companies use plants to isolate drugs to make huge profits.
Sliced bread
Activities are free, with small fee charged for those building rockets from kits.
Disclaimer: I don’t always wear my glasses. The television is always on, but we’re not necessarily paying attention. The television in the bedroom isn’t a big screen. If you ask me a question, I’ll always give you an answer, even if I don’t know the answer. The answer will never be: “I don’t know”. Cross racial identification is notoriously unreliable.
Take my marriage to the sociopath, for example. I stuck that out long past the point where most, less hopeful, less springy, people would have left. However, there was a gift in the staying, which I have only recently realized. I found my worth by staying in that marriage for so long. I finally realized that I really do deserve better. No, I deserve the best, despite my past. I deserve happiness. I wonder if I would have figured that out had I not stayed so long?
½ tsp of baking powder
You’re often disappointed by the realities of life, the shortcomings of others, or of yourself. You don’t want to accept the imperfections of the world, a feeling that drives you constantly to try to improve upon it. Rather than being satisfied with your efforts, and those of others, you relentlessly push on, striving for even greater accomplishments.
songs less firm than your body's whitest song
This Exclusive offer is ONLY available to guests that book with Pixie Vacations.
Her early period of works consisted of mainly sculptures and graphics. Flodin at an early age also became familiar with various methods of printmaking. A Paris exhibition in 1908 included subjects such as Helsinki and clouds representing her graphic works.
Something about a commonly held belief or myth that you'd like to take umbrage with.
Nicely done, Mr. Savage. He then wittily stood by his thesis
Todays library selections -
Where do you write, blog, draw, create?
Anyways- much love and peace to each of you.
Mexican pilsner first brewed in the early 1900's and aptly named Beer of the Pacific because the brewery is based in Mazatlan on the Pacific Coast of Mexico. Currently brewed by Mexican beer giant Grupo Modelo (mostly owned by Anheuser-Busch).
As the day went on people were DMing me asking for names. I was going to try to be more organized this year and divvy up the names, but I can’t find a way to do that without being self-congratulatory. So here’s 1 link to a victims names list. I’ll be blacking out my avy and tweeting victims names that day, and if anyone wants to join me that would be nice.
And then sit around and wait for the big day to come! There are so many good things and negative things when it comes to moving. What are some things you do to make packing up for a big move less stressful? Have any of you moved recently?
2. New Supplier’s
Milwaukee Brewers - Baseball Dad
We decided to take the Motor Home on a little sojourn up to Upton-on-Severn, though technically it should be down as it is south west from home.
I kind of butt in and explain things to the lady. I'm considerably more seasoned in the restaurant business than the girls I was working with, so I am used to handling grumpy custies. By the time I finish with her, she isn't happy... but calmed. I walk off and continue working hard to turn tables.
I am an anxious person. To counteract the anxieties, which I know cannot be real; I attempt to make order of my day. This way I know what will happen at 9:00 (I’ll wake up) or 3:00 (I’ll visit the library). The lists serve two functions. They are a prediction of the future, today. Tomorrow, they become a record of the past. Something to leave behind for – someone – in case. If I am erased, it is my own fault.
As she's turning the interior of her car upside down, I politely interrupted her and told her that I'd have to place her under arrest and take her to jail in the hopes that her case can be heard in front of a Judge sometime during the day. She gets out of her car still looking for the missing documents I had verbally warned her for.
They are gorgeous little animals, a little smelly, up close. It is sad that housing developments are eating away at their habitat. 4,000 per year are admitted to the Koala hospital in Brisbane.
She noted that FAC was recently chosen with a team of for-profit developers to develop a project at Public Place in Gowanus that “will deliver more affordable housing” than the revised Atlantic Yards plan, at one-tenth the cost to the public. (An apples to apples comparison isn't easy, however, so let's just say the cost issue deserves more scrutiny._
Fashion a trellis out of some flexible sticks and ornamental grass blades or twine. Ribbons would be pretty, too.
Amidst the wind and gentle wave
the oil of gladness
Nel volerlo arcifreddissimo (1748 edition, p.19)
Something else that stands out is that it’s God peace that protects. It’s not Judy’s peace or the “peace” the government gives. This isn’t even a peace that comes from my husband or my parents. This is the peace that God has and the last time that I checked, He wasn’t stressed out about anything.
We watched our boys play football and our daughter play basketball. We celebrated Joshua's football season as well as his 18th birthday. With his birthday came the signing of papers for him to become a Marine.
3.) Abortion -
Today I sat with Colette again, as if at the table opposite her, tasting the bread, the wine, the cheese, watching her watch and record the world around her, and I looked up at the world I have created here at the cottage, and I felt awe at the simple beauty I have gathered like wildflowers in a garden basket over my arm. The rickety old Moroccan lamp filled with brightly colored Christmas lights on the fireplace hearth next to a sleeping big black dog on his bed, the sea blue green vintage wicker table and lamp glowing against the golden pine wall and shutters, parrots chattering in another room, tiny blue parakeets conversing in my writing room, a cozy room off of my bedroom, the soft whirring of an overhead fan, one pug licking his paws while another snored, the rustling of my greenwing macaw's feathers as one drifted silently to the floor while he preened, ridding himself of moulting feathers, all of this happened in a single moment, and in the next breath, the moment was gone and the next moment brought a multitude of new gifts.
Klaus Balkenhol (Olympic medalist)
the padre’s biggest loser continues to rock on.
Roll you like you were dice
On the market – Ubiquitous. By far the best known of the St Austell range. If you prefer not to leave the house - the brewery has a decent online shop.
Have you started a new exercise regime this month?
The girls who will drive me places - like the showing of Top Gun and August Rush in the park.
I liked this issue even though there were some common sense problems. Turnbull had some of the best characterization here that I have ever seen. He's cold, cruel, spineless, evil, and very very easily despised. the common sense problems I had were Jonah being near death and still being able to climb the whip and jump over the wall (unless he was playing possum), and I can't figure out why Jonah even needed to visit the Gov other than to be accused of his murder.
Xypherous: I merely employ the logic of probability and cost-benefit calculation.
After lunch we spent a couple of hours at Bert and Jackie's and came back with another trailer full of big stones which went straight into a barrow and up onto the garden. At that point we'd completed all the tasks for the day - there was an amount of standing around in amazement going "hmm, shall we stop or carry on"?
A lot of authors talk about how they need this and that, or rooms at this temperature, and these items around them.
2 variation
OMGosh is this lady full of talent she fits in the ALL the categories I listed above. Take a stroll over and visit her and her amazing home!
Enter a homophobic cop who is willing to go to any lengths to tie Cartwright into the crime, and the stage is set for a political downfall in spite of Cartwright’s valiant efforts to salvage it.
She's married to an LA Times editor. They fuck once every two weeks. According to her foreplay consists of him asking her if they should do it. Then he kisses her, generically, and starts to unbutton his pants. They have a child. And a nanny to take care of that child.
Too many on our side have become hardened toward everybody rather than directing their ire and resistance toward the rightful target. It's less dangerous to say 'cut off all social programs', than to say 'cut off benefits to non-citizens' or 'to those with higher incomes.' The latter might be 'bigoted', you see.
My favourite building in this area is the old Free Library, now a branch of Littlehampton’s public library service, standing on the corner of Maltravers Road with Fitzalan Road. I have not been able to find out much about this beautiful piece of work, other than a reference to its opening in 1906. As far as I can see, it is not listed by English Heritage, which I find odd in view of some of the piles they thus dignify. If you think three views of the building a little excessive, well, sorry, but I do like it a lot!
Shoes: Christian Louboutin
I want to show you my Back to School decor. I don't usually get too excited about these kinds of things. The times are few and far between when I feel like I have AND know how to coordinate an ensemble of things to display for a given season. You are the supreme expert in this area, and so I learn a lot from you.
Finding freedom:
Russell Hughes-Pickering and Dilwyn Roberts-Young, who give up hours of their time to coach the Aberystwyth and District Junior Football League a junior football league, discovered to their cost that Nanny does not like competition.
Clearly we have a caption that the Signal Corps gave the image which identifies the contraption in the photo as a mobile battery plant, but I have no idea how such a thing would work and the image itself offers very few clues. What I do know is that this image is the closest I’ve ever seen any item in our collection get to Steampunk.
The torture, er, adventure, wasn't over. Little did I know that for our final destination the boat would leave us pretty far away from the island and we'd have to swim there. OH MY GOODNESS!!! I figured I'd just stay on the boat and wait until everyone came back...2 hours later! But then something clicked in me and I decided to just go for it. My hubby wouldn't let me drown and I would probably never get to have this memory again, so I did it! I put the floaty thing on and (with a lot of help from my friends) I made it to shore. Oh, and what an amazing experience it was to be on that tiny island where the fish come kiss your feet at the shore and the rocks form warm delicious pools to bathe in. Where the colors are so bright you just wish your brain had film so you could record every second of what you are seeing and replay it over and over again.
by Andrea
A few weeks ago I found myself clambering over the roof of Ely Cathedral on a freezing winter’s day looking for a convenient place to conceal a corpse – or at least part of one. Before you call the police, perhaps I should explain that this was research for a joint medieval crime novel I write every year with a team of five other medieval crime and thriller writers known as the Medieval Murderers – Philip Gooden, Susannah Gregory, Michael Jecks, Bernard Knight, and Ian Morson. It was not the best day to have chosen to venture up on to a cathedral tower, but I only had one day to do it. It was blowing a gale. My fingers and face were numb with cold and I was trying not to be sick every time I looked down. (I never used to be bothered by heights – is it an age thing, I wonder?)
Nothing can beat, bunking the office for a ride.
1/3 cup peas, fresh or frozen
Further on, for the people who think I do drugs, only one word can be said: NO! I have not once in my life used drugs, not even to experiment. WOAH! HOLD UP, HOLD UP! A RAPPER NOT DOING DRUGS?! IMPOSSIBLE!
It is the first of Eric’s novels that I have read, but I hope to be able to get around to others in the future. Four and one-half bees.
I don’t recall the specific time or date, but somewhere in 1999-2000 I came across references to the Mayan Calendar. Most of these were new-agey, and didn’t really clarify much about what the calendar was, or how it functioned, and at the time I found it difficult to find anything that pointed me in the right direction. Either it was archeological material, which was more focused on ruins and interpreting glyphs, or it was new age stuff, which imposed a lot of meaning that I don’t think belonged to Mesoamerican belief systems.
The F-Express stopped at Church Avenue, 7th Avenue, and then Bergen Street. It was really a time when hardly anyone got on at Fort Hamilton Parkway or 15 Street Prospect Park. Maybe all the Moms were home and the Dads worked in Brooklyn, who knows. But bottom line, those stations were not very crowded back in the early 70’s. And I know because I was there every day if I missed the F-Express.
We started simply walking across the floor like a showgirl and then progressed to a series of step-ball changes and hip movements. There were only three of us in the class--me, a slender and beautiful young girl who was probably a little older than my kids, and a woman named Becky who was probably a little younger than my mother. Or maybe not.
What is a better way to celebrate Valentine’s Day than to crown a winner? :) We want to thank you all for participating and leaving such sweet comments about the new stamps and the fab creations on the Design Team Blogs! Thank you!
The Most Overlooked Maintenance That Every Homeowner Should Know About
So, in my world. Moving. That was fun.
We are in serious trouble in Canada and I am not sure that political correctness will not prevail to all our detriment.
“Whoa, take it easy. People will start talking again.”
When I first started trying to control the magical thinking, I ended up letting the last of my magical practice go. I decided to “disbelieve the illusion” that magic was real, giving myself the time and space I needed to recover. If it wasn’t real, that was one less thing to obsess over.
I'm exuding a lot of mental energy giving myself silent talks about not freaking out over losing a week of school because we're sick. It happens to everyone and it's not going to majorly impact anything in the long run. I just wanted to do school this week. Boo.
8. Date Night (All Night Mix) 05:04
We should remember that who and the circumstances we were born into are luck and that you are not entitled to greed and wealth from birth, no matter who you are.
If Poe is not your style, maybe you’d like a trip to Iceland with newlyweds Jeffrey and Susie Hill in Huldufolk, which is based on Icelandic folklore, written by Watts. Along with the book, he is giving away a copy of The Traffic Lights CD, the band in Watts’ book, with each book purchase. Watts composed the music for his fictional band.
We're colored people and we all gotta share this space
I love my George. He has aged a little too much and has lost some of his finish on the grill. Time for a new one. This is the one a reader told me about. You can remove the plates for easy washing.
And with the announcement of Claire Legrand's forthcoming YA novel, Winterspell, which is a new take on the story of The Nutcracker, I started thinking about some of the stories I would love to see retold or reimagined or explored (again or further or in new ways).
“And yet, in spite of these facts, CAMRA is being criticised for refusing to embrace keg beer. It seems scarcely credible, yet the question of CAMRA and keg raised its over-carbonated head at the annual SIBA conference in February. Some SIBA members are either making keg beer or are considering doing so and wanted to know what the Campaign’s attitude would be. My reply – and it was a personal one – was that if some brewers want to make keg they are perfectly free to do so but, given the current success of cask beer, I thought they would do better to concentrate on real ale.”
This one-act opera tells the story of the Roman Emperor Scipio Africanus, who, in a dream, awakens to find two goddesses before him: Fortune and Constancy. He must choose one or the other to guide him through life. Dazed by their enticements and threats, Scipio calls up his dead forebears for guidance in making this important and dangerous choice. April 11- 21. $30, $75 and $125.
No one said life was ever easy, and I’m still very young. Oh, what the rest of this year might bring scares me. It’s supposed to be my year, the year of the Dragon.
I withdrew my work –
The sounds outside the door changed but continued with a frenzy. Xu Guan could picture an angry American soldier kicking the door as he had seen in one of the training films his platoon had been shown.
After 2 days of painting I had the fun part of putting everything back into the room, freshly dusted and polished. I have changed the curtains (you can just see a glimpse above) to a vintage linen pair of floral design on a black background.
The BT520 seems to work at least as well as any of the top noise canceling headsets I have tried and a lot less expensive, $66 through Amazon.
But I was fucking angry. I was a full time student. So was my girlfriend. We both had part time jobs. We took turns doing what needed to get done; we switched it up when one of us got tired of, say, balancing the checkbook (or more likely made too many mistakes). We argued and fought, but loved and spent a lot of time focusing on what was important, our son. We sacrificed our autonomy or ability to participate in things other 20 year olds were doing.
(For more information on the complicated world of foreign rights, see this interesting article, which covers the issues involved in selling rights overseas and offers a good overview of the value a literary agency can bring to such transactions.)
Because, tell me, would you write an epic sci-fi story about intergalactic warfare told in third person with the same “voice” you wrote your first-person self-deprecating autobiography of when you were fourteen, just entered high school, and a zit was the worst thing that could happen?
DYSTOPIA AND GLOBAL REBELLION
He may have felt that but that doesn’t stop people looking to the likes of him for direction. The problem is, as Nina Khrushcheva put it in an article in the New York Sun, “that Solzhenitsyn's ideas were too conservative, too tied to Russian nationalism, for him to become a symbol of democracy in a multinational Soviet Union.” She concludes:
Reno King Lawrence.”
Row 1) k3, p3, k3 accross
As we know, sadly, a cancer journey can end with dying. The strand of beads a child had showing their courage, is something for their family to save. Beads of Courage also gives a butterfly bead to the family who has lost their loved one. I hate to think of a strand of beads with a final butterfly at the end of it, yet know that each of the beads on the strand 'does' show a moment in time and a reflection of the child's personality in color and design, with hope and some happiness tossed in.
problems--I have no funds for lawyers, what to stay within fair use. If the piece is very short, three may be too many. Yes, if I think the source will be happy with promotion of their site, I sometimes take a change on a longer excerpt.
11. Don't Worry, Baby (Durnett, Perez, Rosas) 3:19
That said, if your curiosity was peaked by the preview or the recent buzz, or if you're anticipating being dragged along by a friend, don't worry: you won't be complaining about wanting that couple of hours of your life back. In fact, you should be able to enjoy everything The Hunger Games movie has to offer with only a few small points of explanation, should your movie buddy have already read the book.
the layers and layers of ice and cement
6/12 - The Deadly Companions (1961)
You have to USE your binder and it has to be designed to work for you or else it'll be time and money poorly spent. Think through your categories and what will work in your home.
The gibbon is the world’s best animal. Its natural habitat is tropical and subtropical rainforest, but this one is in someone’s letterbox:
Quiz over, students getting squirrely, and we still had 20 minutes left in class. I'd planned to show a video about Shakespeare and tragedy that can stream through a website called Discovery Education. Like the flipchart software, I don't want to denigrate this useful educational tool, because it's chock full of swell resources for the classroom, but if you couldn't tell already, Friday wasn't my day. The video loaded so slowly, I thought the students would revolt. Then, once it was streaming, I was informed through loud beeps and whistles that you could only go full screen through Internet Explorer. Seriously? Who makes their interweb applications only work through Microsoft products these days. Corporate stooges, that's who. So after another excruciating few minutes, the video was loaded on full screen and projected onto the smartboard, which is located in the exact worst spot in my room (but that's also another story), and I thought I might could breath for the last ten minutes of class.
After losing Sarah, the friend he’s loved, to some other guy, Jameson meets Sky. Her Native American roots, fluid movements, and need for brutal honesty become addictive fast. This is good. Jameson needs distraction – his dad leaves for another woman, his mom’s walking around like a zombie, and Sarah’s new boyfriend can’t keep his hands off of her.
While you're experimenting, add nutmeg, ginger, vanilla, etc. to your liking as well.
Why is it pink.
The results of all this insomniac mind-racing is below. Can't say I'm proud of everything on this list, and some of it is just plain random. "+" means I've seen them more than once--sometimes WAY more than once. Enjoy!!
When person X just gets under your skin. Time after time after time again. Then someone else comes along and confirms that person X really is the irritant you think they are…. Next thing you know you just went on a verbal shoot out killing this persons image.
A lot of gloss,
We found a note in our mailbox on Wednesday from a production company saying that they were looking at houses like ours to potentially use in two scenes in a film that they'll be shooting in this area. It would be a professor's house and used for two party scenes. They're coming out tomorrow afternoon to look at our house and see if it will work for what they need!
I shouldn’﻿t much mind
Have a great Monday Ladies!
she runs with wolves
Promoted vegetarian diet in The Republic
Happy Mother's Day to all the mums out there. I hope you are all enjoying your special day.
Around me,absent television and Internet, silence and darkness, my thoughts; a candle and a dream.
I really love the Muppets and it’s always a happy time when there is a movie with them.
Violations of the laws or customs of war which include, but are not limited to, murder, ill-treatment or deportation to slave-labor or for any other purpose of civilian population of or in occupied territory, murder or illtreatment of prisoners of war, of persons on the seas, killing of hostages, plunder of public or private property, wanton destruction of cities, towns, or villages, or devastation not justified by military necessity.
Tradition has it in Pennsylvania Dutch country that eating this dish on New Years Day will bring one good luck for the year. How could you pass that up?
Preheat the oven to 375°F (190°C) and prepare two large baking sheets by either lining with parchment or oven paper or lightly greasing.
More broadly, a scholarly edition provides a map of documents and the human interventions that affect those documents. Our knowledge and needs continue to change, requiring new representations (and new editions) to assist our understanding of works from the past. Mapping Joseph Furphy’s Such is Life will grow with the electronic edition of the typescript and its textual descendants, providing useful notes to understand the conception, composition, revision, publication and reception of Furphy’s works. All of these things are inexorably connected to material and temporal phenomena that can be reimagined in documentary traces that have been preserved for close scrutiny.
So I circled the two that needed to be done with the replacement of the Master Cylinders and when you do that you have to get your Brake system flushed. RepairApp did mention that too!
Decision? I don’t want to have to make the same one as before. We’ve had Moll for 11 years, but we don’t know how old she was when we got her so she could be a bit older. She’s a self-imposed house cat, and it’s quite odd to not know where she is. But, we have to remember that she won’t be here forever regardless of what the tests find and at some point we’re going to have to let her go.
In one TV ad of Manny, he is seen standing in muddy field as he was acting as helping a duck farmer. And to my amazement, he was shown wiping his dirty hands on his orange shirt. And it was a close-up! It was disgustingly unnatural. Manny’s PR guys must go to Salug Valley in Mindanao and consult the farmers there how to wipe dirty hands on shirts!
The others.... I know Marsha Warfield is a funny woman but here she is stuck playing the serious black woman role without much of a chance to shine in a comedic sense. Bil Maher would become best-used as a political commentator and judging from his soft-spoken deliveries here, it was probably for the best. The lines he gives about being a cab driver and Judas picking up the check for The Last Supper are good for a smile, but a Slob Comedy needs constant belly laughs. And Max Gail, looking nothing like "Barney Miller"'s Wojciehowicz, is in the proceedings far too little to make much of an impression other than when he lights up his flamethrower to start up his fireplace. DeWayne Jessie... he was Otis Day in Animal House too, so maybe this was a token gesture thing, since he doesn't really do much else but show up in his Rastafarian dreads, knitted cap, little vest and tie dyes?
Before you finally go ahead and have children, find a couple who already are parents and berate them about their...
I’m back, after some time off for vacations and training.
From the red cliff of the mountain —
Now, the condition of an intellect free from cravings and aversions itself counters terrorism. Terrorism is done when the intellect is deeply attached and is hateful. The metaphors and the high standards of humanism exhibited in the Bhagavad Gita are unparalleled.
I have been away from my blog for way to long and i do apologize for those who read and those who may need help, but, I am returning will do all that I can for anyone with a question, comment or concern. Just let me know how I may help, and i will do my best, and I believe together WE CAN MAKE A DIFFERENCE.
I initially considered wearing around my chest as a nipple protector, but soon realised that such an application would be pointless. A gorilla’s nipples are pretty secure at the worst of times, and I’ve not met the human who would dare to pinch them without prior consent.
She set up the restaurant with Ruth Rogers in 1987.
Ride, Forrest, ride: After three BFTS events the riders have combined to cover 167 of 394 bulls for a cumulative riding average of 42.39 percent. Of the 39 riders with five or more outs this season, only 18 are riding above that average.
Thomas Monson was a bishop at age 22, a mission president at age 31, and became a member of the Quorum of the Twelve Apostles at age 36. In our day, these are remarkably young ages for any of these major leadership positions. They represent a lifetime of service in the ministry.
I finally found their tiny house, very modest, with a happy dog in the small scruffy but flower filled garden. A lady came out to greet me. Beautiful. Walking tall, her elegance strangely out of place in such a modest setting.
I talk with my husband and my friends, hoping that something in our conversation will align all the stars in what I’m keystroking. I see a glimmer of an idea; maybe THIS will be the glue that pulls it all together. I start writing again … again, feeling the flow, love, yada-yada …
36-38 The Calls
What if Daniel Goldstein and other eminent domain plaintiffs take a buyout? What if the plaintiffs succeed in stalling the plan, or stopping it?
BG18
He must have pretended to be their friend. Perhaps he made up excuses to come over and borrow stuff. Perhaps he and his wife became nags, a nuisance, but J and his wife were too nice to say anything about it. Perhaps they were secretly afraid.
you know you are in for a long day
last long so take it rapidly. We'll have to see if anything
As you may, or may not know, Lager needs to ferment at a much cooler temperature, and under the city the tunnels are a cool 55 degrees. If the temperature were to rise, they would pack ice and run cool water through the pipes to keep it cool.
67 - Wayne Nordhagen
In front of that you'll see the Summer Crafting brochure from Doncaster a few weeks ago. There in it is Nigel's autograph - which incidentally I didn't ask him for - he assumed I wanted it (bless him)... I did also have my photograph taken with him, also with Phill (who I'm not sure is actually with DO crafts anymore - and I have one with the Glitter Girls too (how friendly were they???! - loads that's how much).
Next the 2 3/8” Scalloped Circle Punch and the 1 ¾” Scalloped Circle punch were used on a scrap of Whisper White cardstock. The scalloped circles were cut in half with Paper Snips. The scalloped edges were sponged with Pool Party ink and the clouds were adhered to the card front with Stampin’ Dimensionals.
What I was planning to do was dangerous. I knew neither of us was really ready; that the timing wasn't perfect. Neil was still hurting from his divorce, I knew that. Sometimes when I look at him I ask myself: where is it, that thing inside of you, cutting you, where is it?
Published April 23, 1893
The creative bug strikes again! After making my knitting and sewing binders I had a hankering to use up more of my scrapbook paper collection ( can you hear my husband cheering in the background?). I decided I needed a blog idea notebook. There have been times that I have been out and about and an idea hits. I jot down my notes on a random piece of paper that, inevitably, I lose. Now I have to remember what it was I wanted to write about, which is quite the feat since having a baby. So to combine necessity with creativity, I took a simple composition notebook and transformed it into (if I do say so myself) a work of art. If you want to make your own…
I’m the one who sits inside pulling from within you, the truth,
Here's what my studio looks like right now as I create new patterns and color mixes!
I have liked the other Southern Tier brews that I have tried, so I will most likely try this one again. Compared to the Lefthand I had this weekend, it didn't land on it's feet.
I've fallen back into petty things (don't take it the wrong way, they aren't bad things and maybe not petty for others, but for me right now they have become petty compared with the things I have learned in Panama). I haven't spoken out.
“This is the room with the damp” I say, not adding that it was the room in which I rocked my daughter to sleep through her first dark winter. We move downstairs. “There’s a crack in this wall some people might notice” I point out, not mentioning the Boxing Day we once spent here giggling through games of charades with family and friends, during our only ever London Christmas.
I haven’t even gotten to the dialogue, which was amazing (Go read the scene where Beau and Ambrose are out on their respective building decks with Beau giving Ambrose the business – fucking awesome). This had some of the best monologues I’ve read in a script. There wasn’t a single moment in the story where I didn’t believe what was coming out of a character’s mouth. That NEVER happens when I read a script.
I feel dishonest, sitting in a folding chair on community night while these earnest people open up their lives to each other, knowing I am not being vulnerable in return, knowing they would not know how to respond if I were, knowing there is no room for me here.
Not complaining at all. Means I can buy more supplies, which I like doing more than making jewelry!
Puff pastry tarts with fruit or Puffs filled with chocolate chips
Now I can't wait to try some of the other flavors in the cookbook!
6. Unschooling parents neither shelter their kids, nor let them loose with no guidance.
When billows toss, oh! Who would cross the Blue Men’s stream?
I wanted to share how I am starting to organize the math centers I make. I don't make literacy centers because the reading program we use doesn't allow for it. I started doing math centers after winter break and my kids love them and so do I. I bought a BIG container from Joanne's with my teacher discount (love that!) and am using labels/file folders to organize them. Here is what it looks like:
Not everything in this blog will be about my health or lack thereof. Some of it will be just to get it Off My Chest.
quartet, and covers Alanna’s years as a page at the royal castle in Chorus, meeting some lifelong friends (George Cooper, Prince Jon, Gary, Raoul, Alex, Sir Myles, and the very dangerous Roger, Duke of Conté). Alanna struggles with not only learning the skills it takes to be a knight (archery, fencing, jousting), but also with being a small girl trying to keep up with much larger boys, and becoming a woman (against her will) at the same time she’s doing everything in her power to become the best boy/man/knight she can be. Alanna struggles with trying to uphold the code of chivalry, at the same time she’s lying to all her friends (and enemies) about who she really is. And she struggles with learning that war is not all glory and fun.
I beg, I implore, I get down on bended knee and grovel: next time you're about to use the term Mary-Sue, stop and look at my little checklist above. And if the character you are about to describe does not hit all the points on the checklist? DON'T.
The ash planters have gone from dubious to vibrant green spears of Chasmanthe, ruffled collars of Veltheimia, a carpet of leaves from the assorted tiny bulbs, all woven together by acid drop yellow Oxalis.
I pull out my keychain and try to scan the ragged and frayed customer loyalty tag. After the first two attempts and it doesn’t register, I’m still reasonably patient. After three more, my brow starts to furrow. After five more, I’m having violent flashbacks of trying to get wrinkled dollar bills in the junior high vending machine. At about the tenth try, I’m cursing whoever designed the loyalty card (“Let’s see. . . We need something that will stand up to the wear and tear and rubbing against metal keys every day. I know, let’s just laminate a piece of paper.”). Then it finally beeps.
Sunday was unexpectedly beautiful here in NH.
My friend, Deana, entered this recipe in one of my contests at the Iowa State Fair. When I saw the cranberries, I knew it would be perfect for an after Thanksgiving recipe. Deana used chicken in her original recipe; I changed it to turkey.
1.- Tokyo is huge. Most people already know it’s a big city. We constantly hear that it has the largest amount of people in the world, and we see pictures of the famous cross walk all the time. But after a 3 hour ride on a subway from the airport to ALMOST downtown, I finally understood how big this city really is. Hint: BIG
It would be great to be shipwrecked in good weather, land on an island which has easily obtained food, no hostile wildlife, plenty of water, and the dame finds me irresistibly clever and strong--in that Clark Gable don't give a damn way.
I was always a barely-controlled sniveling basket case of scar tissue, snot and blood, but after September 11th, I had to fight even harder to keep that blubbering little worm under wraps. In the weeks before that day, I was surrounded by family and friends in Texas and Colorado, I frolicked in the Canyonlands and drove my purple car 90 miles an hour across Arizona, with the wind tangling my hair into befuddled little snarls, the skin on my arms golden brown, the wrinkle between my eyes all but gone. By the end of September, it was back, and deeper than ever...my skin paled until it was as colorless as my soul, and my first grey hairs appeared. I became a phantom on the subway to work, a ghost on the sidewalk, walking through Times Square, with all the other shadows. We all wept on occasion. In this ashen world, did we finally really see each other? Instead of protecting personal space on the train, you could almost feel the person next to you leaning in, drawing support and warmth from your own broken and fragile body....as tears rolled silently down my face, I felt a hand touch my arm....but even so, I was so terribly alone.
What: Preview Workout and Meet and Greet with owner and staff of CrossFit Assault
Uppermost in Hodgson’s mind is whether Ferdinand and Terry can play alongside one another without their private issues getting in the way. Hodgson would ideally like to include them both in his Euro 2012 squad but will not make up his mind whether it is workable until he has spoken to both players, starting with Ferdinand. What he should not expect is a desire on the part of either player for peace talks.
And just look at the state of that dining table! I need it for a mini photo shoot on Saturday, I'd better get it tidied up tomorrow, lol.
Over the years we’ve taken many photos with the anchor in Montreal and were geeked to stumble upon one in Old Town.
As the packaging states, birds can be slow to interact with new objects in their home. It took our two almost a week to approach the new bowling alley. I’m somewhat disappointed that our guys don’t bowl with gusto, but they do like standing in front of their new diversion to peck, poke, and stare into the mirror. Maybe in time the play will get more animated.
"YEAH, go dogs!"
The anti-Whites give us Whites two choices: Accept White geNOcide or you are an “evil-racist”.
It is excellent.
Ask the princess if her fare was too high
Neil Dollard, 28, Hoboken, N.J.
There was behaving in the right way – no cussing, no lying, no cheating, obey your parents – all kinds of rules.
Photography is a trend, but I need a magic wand.
Truth, for pre-Socratic Greeks, was not just a matter of words and statements. The Greeks word for truth is aletheia (unhiddeness/forgottenness). Aletheia was a kind of experience, or a transformation in experience. Obviously, not everything that transforms our experience counts as truth. A cerebral concussion transforms our experience, but there is nothing ‘true’ about it beyond the fact that you have taken a blow to the head. The poetic truth that was affirmed in ancient societies was transformative in the sense that it had an existentially orienting effect. This is how we should understand poetic speech. Oracles and poets spoke the truth by using words to trigger insights into the nature of everyday social life and existence. Poetic speech resonates with ordinary experience, triggering, clarifying, and consolidating insights into the realities of our everyday socio-cultural existence. It works to attune us, and ground us in, the norms of social existence.
Some community forum members, staying in contact with the police patrols, followed the men on foot while the citizens also threw up several roadblocks with the police to try and capture the men.
… What we have seen in the past year is the power players now have that comes from the pressure put upon schools and coaches who block transfer options. Thanks to the Twitterverse, it didn’t take all that long for PR messes to entangle Maryland’s Randy Edsall, Tennessee’s Derek Dooley or Wisconsin basketball coach Bo Ryan, and eventually, after being called out, each school backed off and allowed their former players more options.
(At this point, perhaps I should mention that I don’t recall ever hearing any commentary or examination of which of these possibilities in fact occurred. If you know of any, please direct me to them!)
They ran out of food and died off.
I really came to like Addisyn. She knew what she wanted and set out to get it. One of the things she wanted was Greysan, an angel in her Link. The romance grew slowly and made me remember the confusion and self doubt of young love. And the anticipation! Remember this feeling?
As usual, it's time to give you the names of the winners selected at random:
Great Judge, to Thee our prayers we pour,
The problem with girls like me, is that we want it all but when we get it all, we aren’t sure if it’s what we wanted after all.
Magnificence(1973) the central character, Jed, is a terrorist and closes the play with a futile gesture of despair and blows up himself and the cabinet minister he is holding hostage.
Start supper
Chameleon
Local people protested. Bangla blogosphere erupted. Some newspapers ( especially those cunning-smart ones who can read peoples pulse way in advance) published the news.
Camilla Nylund and Brian Hymel, singing Rusalka and the Prnice, are absoutely stunning. Technically, these roles are demanding, requiring unusual range and vocal agility. Nylund and Hymel don't compromise by shading downwards, so we hear the full intensity of extreme timbre as it cuts and carries. We listen in awe as their voices soar up and down the scale, for the range is a source of wonder. We're not dealing with the "real" world here, but a hyper-intense world of magic. Nylund and Hymel are "acting" with their voices because Dvořák gives them so much, and they give in return. We've had good singing at the Royal Opera House this year, but Nylund and Hymel lift things to another, if stranger, level, for that is the nature of this opera. Nylund has long been a specialist in unusual repertoire and Hymel has made his name as the Prince. ("It's a role that's been good to me" - please see this interview wth him). In this performance, Nylund and Hymel show that they are forces to be reckoned with.
Your skin is the first thing that people notice about you and that is why a proper skin care regimen is so important. There are many products that claim to help improve skin tone and promote a flawless complexion, but the truth is that there is no such thing as instant results.
- I didn't want to use bread crumbs in the tart since I was keeping it gluten/grain free, so I used a mixture of coconut flour and ground hazelnuts to line the dough. Because I was lazy, I used the same mixture for the galette as well.
Now, I am not saying that all unschoolers are motivated for all the right reasons, and that all kids who go to school are truly lazy because they accept the status quo. To suggest that would be ludicrous; life is not so neat as to be easily bisected into good and bad, right and wrong, motivated and lazy. Not by a long shot. What I am saying is that when we think of laziness, it might be better to not think of it in terms of physical activity or even in terms of what our children have "accomplished" each day. Why? Because no child should have their lives summed up in such narrow terms; it is fundamentally disrespectful.
26. Universal entered the 3-D market with the film, It Came from Outer Space (1953)
Consider Phlebas, who was once handsome and tall as you.
-- Malcolm
That was that. I made a egg noodle in Miso-soup. Tasted boring.
Dinner: 45g carbohydrates
However, a person is unable openly to show love except to someone in whom he finds a good element. He will thus be able to direct his love to the dimension of the good. He will not be hurt by the evil side in those people to whom he will extend love in meeting his commitment to love people, which involves being good and extending good to the wicked as well as the good.
We had a warm streak in early spring and now we are at the end of April and it’s been much cooler. It hasn’t gotten above 65f for almost 2 weeks. Strange weather but spring in NJ is always a surprise.
Hi Readers — Like the headline says: A Jersey boy, 11, found a lighter on his way to school. Brought it in, another kid noticed it, by 8:40 a.m. he was suspended for the day. Why? Because the lighter, “has the potential to compromise student safety in this building,” according to the superintendent quoted in this APP.com story. “It’s our responsibility to keep kids safe. I feel very secure about our decision. We have zero tolerance for this type of thing.”
Frederick described setting, character, and plot as the three legs of a stool. After discussing each element she gave participants a five-minute writing assignment before summarizing and moving on to the next element.
Spinach and Kale: Garden Freebies
He would keep a lookout for me when I nipped behind bushes to answer the call of nature; he would hop off his bike ahead of me to open gates when we went cross-country and most of all he would keep me entertained with his tales.
watched as the doors were slowly closing on me,
More info about And the Giraffe
Of the many fascinations of nature videos, not the least are those animals who disguise themselves to capture unsuspecting prey. They wait silently sand-colored on the bottom of the sea or perched limb-like in the branches of a tree before they strike.
So that's about all that's been going on with me - I've been sick for the past week and now I'm trying to write a paper on sexuality - so it's fun times around these parts. Oh and I applied for a TAship and I'm trying apply for financial aid. However, being sick pretty much wiped me out, so now it's Sunday night and I'm trying to do a week's worth of stuff... I'm sure Monday will be fabulous.
Honestly, it made sense: we went to Liberty (I got some lovely fabric, that I think will become a baby-quilt) and she had tried a dim-sum place nearby called Ping Pong. So, I convinced DH to give it a go and it was fantastic. Sake-based martinis and an excellent variety of dim-sum. We both particularly liked the sticky rice and the steamed vegetable buns.
The neighbouring Wodic community has grown up into a rather large wild/agri centre and the druid-like folk of the place (I'll not bother you with the difficult name) have become well-enough liked by the Vrun to be considered a sister-town to the commercial interest of Xudorn. Recently, a devastating, Undead-creating attack upon the Wodic community was launched from out of the jungles of the west and the intrepid PCs have since mounted up on their ornithopters and flown out to investigate the area indicated by the Wodics. On their first reconnoitre of the area, they encountered a sigil-filled circle which glowed with unearthly light from the forest floor. This area was surrounded by strange fog banks, rather unlike clouds, at a height which brought one of the craft in contact with them; the immediate effect of loss of lift upon the craft was instrumental in the onrithopter being drawn in by some sort of 'tractor-beam' and forced to land within the circle. A wodic scout dropped down with an incomplete flying-broom to slow her descent and scouted out the area as the craft's pilot was captured by what appeared to be black-lacquered skeletons.
and laughed like a freaking loon.
Very good question. These are actually exceptions. Matter of fact, it is highly suggested that when you are sleepy or feel pressured, go ahead and walk around to shake sleepiness off or to wash it away in the restroom. Or, so as not to make your life boring at work, it is encouraged that you strike up a conversation with your colleagues or laugh with them in jokes every so often. That takes out the stress that you are feeling and that makes you enjoy every bit that you are staying for at work. Hence it feels like it is not work at all; that it is like your second home. Therefore, not getting burned out. But do not overdo it. Never abuse it. Regulate it. Still, the company is paying you for your services and to do something work-related and the time that you spend in unnecessary chit-chats and frequent smoking at the designated areas could have been devoted to coming up with innovations and the like.
-- SSN Number
Kael’thas was too far gone to be redeemed, but eventually the Blood Elves discovered the destruction caused by their addictions and poor choices.
And in a chain reaction
So, I'm still wearing my unhealthy mask and right now? That's comfortable for me. I know I can't wear this mask forever and I can already feel my two worlds getting closer and closer. I'm sure they'll collide soon, I don't think it'll happen in days, but within a matter of months, MY mask will overcome the mask I've been wearing since my mom died.
I exercise longer than I intend._____
“Angel kept talking and waking the baby up. If she gets out of bed again, we’re putting the gate up.”, she said slightly frustrated and looking at Vince for approval. He simply nodded in reply.
This is where we're at today.
Hope you all had a lovely and peaceful Christmas! This post was of course planned for yesterday but was too tired and caught up all day... why? because I just arrived in Thailand! Although I convinced myself I would not have the time to go, I decided last minute that my marketing report could just as well be done on the beach. One of the best decisions I've ever made. If it works remains to be seen.
I looked at the little old lady opposite who was laughing at EVERY fart noise…thus providing encouragement to the mad one to improve the sound effects with each attempt. I looked at a couple of middle-aged commuters showing complete contempt on their faces (presumably they’d had sense of humour failure) and I looked at the big, burly guy standing a few feet away whose shoulders were heaving in laughter as he watched the old lady laugh.
-1 (10.5 oz. can) of chicken broth (I have a measuring cup that is able to measure in ounces, so I bought a big box of broth and just measured it out)
2 whether
In our small town, we celebrate our country's birth on the 3rd of July. That's because the fireworks technicians are booked at larger venues on the fourth. By celebrating on the third, we can schedule a top-notch show that might only be seen in a larger city. The other added benefit of celebrating on the third, is that we have an extra day to fully enjoy the festivities. It's like the whole weekend is the 4th of July.
Which reminds me of something which will make you smile. When I go to the supermarket on a Tuesday morning I always go to the same man on the check-out. We have a mutual friend and it is part of my Tuesday ritual to have a chat with Richard. Yesterday he admired some pears I had bought and I said, "Did you know that Flaubert said that a pear was only perfect for eating for about ten minutes in its entire life - before that it was unripe and after that it was too ripe and almost uneatable"? No, he didn't know that. Later, as I was packing my trolley he remarked what awful weather it was and I said, "Eliot said April is the cruelest month." His reply was, "I must say this is not the normal sort of conversation I get on the checkout."
A growth formula for 2011-2020
Get More: Mom Shopping Network - Kid-Proof Couture
Guess where I am heading to tomorrow. Guess.
She comes back the next day. The painting is unwrapped. She says I don’t want this. You take it back.
When all of a sudden, a knock at the door.
I said nothing to this. A chimpanzee would probably dine on her like a vampire, but sometimes it’s better to let humans learn from their mistakes.
my momma is the best cook in the world, so we are fed well there even if it isn't a holiday.
The train made the major change to the advancement of the settling of this country. The earliest trains were steam engines that were small but mighty. The size of the steam engine grew with the need for more cars for passengers and freight.
If your child is hurt by cyber-bullying, give the child emotional support by saying, “I am so sorry this is happening to you and so proud of you for having the courage to tell me. This is not your fault and we are going to do what we can to make it stop.” Ask for help from school authorities, your Internet provider or cell phone company, and, if necessary, the police.
I just happened to be at the gallery last weekend, during the second Sacramento African American Art Collective (SAAAC) Art Walk, and this patron was there looking at the artwork for the third time.
Maybe our pineal glands do need to evolve some more…
For the pears
On a quite slow and painful trip to Sainsburys for supplies, I found myself perusing the squash and cordial aisle, and went for an apple and mango high juice, in the hope it may have some similarity to real cider. It does'nt.
and I’ve got to get her there safe.
For the local items, the tenderloin and garlic were from New Roots Farm, the potatoes and onions from Meadows Mirth, rutabagas from Heron Pond, and the garlic powder from Two Sisters Garlic in Canterbury, NH (they have wonderful garlic products - and we were able to order their garlic powder via mail-order since Canterbury is a bit of a drive from where we live - definitely convenient!). For semi-local we had Cabot butter in the rutabagas, and Stonyfield milk in the mashed potatoes. The olive oil, lemon juice, and salt were definitely not local.
and then go out and live in it!
And our top 3 are in no particular order.......
Yep, there it is, my name and not a letter... ;)
This week we feature another newspaper article that needs to be posted in full. It’s from the Delaware County (PA) Daily Times of August 28, 1968.
When Wagstaff arrived, he found a home empty of servants apart from a maid, who gave him directions to the Contessa’s bedchamber before leaving herself. On arriving, he found that both the door and the Contessa were wide open. As the latter sprawled naked on her bed, arching her back like a pussycat about to be stroked, she addressed her guest as follows:
Sort of brings about a physiological reaction in me as well, come to think of it.
definition 2. Foreign, yes — alien, likely. So this would be me, again. I am foreign and alien to this place (or at least its people), since I come from another with different ways — but from my perspective, this place is what is foreign and alien, so all things can, indeed, be seen in more than one way.
staring down at the ground pose (learned) : )
With candida, I can never find a lot to drink when we go out with friends or for that matter whenever we go out. So, I order club soda with a lemon. Now, with the NuNaturals Liquid Lemon Stevia I can make myself a very tasty drink. It is like a treat for me.
And dear friends, let me ask as I hold up the light, how will sin appear when we come to die? It is pleasant now and we can excuse it, calling it a peccadillo, a little trivial mistake, a juvenile error, and imprudence, and so on; but how will sin appear when you come to die? The grim ghosts of our iniquities, if they have not been laid in the grave of Christ Jesus, will haunt our dying bed. What a horrid prospect to be shut in with our sins for ever, to be dying with no comrades about the bed to comfort, but with the remembrances of the past to terrify and to alarm!
I was in such an emotionally raw state that to be honest, I never really took it in til later that night when Jack was asleep and I was able to have some quiet time. I was shocked and stunned to be watching such horror again but I was already in an emotional abyss worrying about Jack's condition that the enormity of it didn't really hit me until about a week later.
"There are fleas in Colorado?" I said.
So after the initial hugs and getting to know each other it was time to get to work. First was "loading" the quilt on the machine. And I got to say, this took longer than I thought it would. I was just so excited (and a bit nervous) to get going, I didn't think about actually having to do the not so fun loading part. It wasn't hard, just time consuming. I compared it to pin basting a quilt :) And it took about that long :) But . . . Once you get through the sour it is on to the sweet.
Blushing Bride: Kiss someone wearing an Elegant Dress while wearing a White Tuxedo Shirt and Black Tuxedo Pants. If you don’t get both pieces as a drop, buy what you need. Ask a friend who has a dress to help you out, hope someone in the start zones is wearing one, or, as a last resort, ask in trade. The Tuxedo pieces cost 25 chocolate each, and make for a good role-play set if you’re into it. (You can buy a dress with chocolate, but since you can’t use it on yourself to get the achievement, the cost is not factored into the 355 total)
At the end of a very long, yet productive morning, I finally sat down in "the chair".
When I was in San Francisco this past weekend, I was able to visit the Wildflower Linen showroom in Potrero Hill. Thanks so much, Lily, for taking time out of your busy weekend (AND day off) to show me your beautiful linens. I really appreciate it. Needless to say, I was in love with all the colors and fabrics! :)
And okay, I get it, it’s supposed to be ridiculous and make no sense. “Congratulations” to the “clever” people who made it. But would it have been too much to ask for a movie that wasn’t this boring? There are a few stand-out moments, but a lot of the movie is just dull, and drags on for no reason. The novelty of the psychic tire gets old fast, and then you’re just left with the occasional stupid line from one of the film’s far too many characters. This just doesn’t really have much going for it. Shame. I never actually thought I would say I was underwhelmed by a movie with this plot summary, but here it is. The world is a funny place…
So how do you spice things up? Well, you can try hitting new bars or those you haven’t been to before or in quite a while. Just don’t be surprised if you see familiar faces or familiar patterns just with different actors.
That is IT!
And then Autumn would come. Clouds would roll upon their chariots of white, scouts leading through that chill the spine, marking me, as I lay under covers, prophetic of the dreams I may have. My father altered and tailored the trees to be more accommodating to survival through the harsher seasons, as I would watch the slow evolution of them becoming bare, Winter’s thin but cruel hands squeezing the life out of each limb, leaving scratches from its nails and hating the thick trunk for the impediment it was.
Each morning I am astonished at how beautiful my little sculpture is. Even better, I'm inspired in new ways every day of things to do, things to teach, and best of all ways to simply enjoy the most amazing art ever created.
IQ, even genius, has no necessary bearing on wisdom, common sense, morality or character. That’s why a smart elite that’s not wise is worse than useless. Intellectual brilliance does not insure against the fancies of craziness, whether Martin Luther’s (est. IQ 170) ranting against reason, heretics, Jews or the abodes of the Devil (e.g. in a Swiss lake), or Ted Turner’s (I.Q. 128) donation of $1 billion to the U.N. Third-World cesspool and championing of every cause of the kooky Left, from Obama to global warming.
A. It’s tempting to limit the BCS championship game to only conference winners. But when you have a system like the BCS that is based on polls, you understand that people will make subjective decisions about teams. What you can’t do is put an asterisk by someone in the BCS standings. A team like Georgia or Ohio State could benefit from not playing, but that is the system that we’ve all agreed on. It keeps the door open for a team that struggled early but finished strong. It gives the voters a chance to evaluate their entire body of work.
myself in the dying lines of your fallen grace,
At one point they were introduced to Mitzi Beach, a psychologist and counselor who was dressed so that Eamon said if he saw her on the street he would've thought she was a bag lady. Afterwards they found out that after meeting them Beach ran to her office and called Superintendent Burke and told him that Antonette and Eamon were in the building. Then Tim O'Brien, an assistant principal joined them and Eamon asked how often they see Superintendent Burke. Both Henry and O'Brien burst out laughing simultaneously and replied, "We never see him."
Staring at me mockingly, as if he knows that I know what's coming. As if to say "He'd better know now".
knowing her fragility
3. The question of objective truth is a central concern of postmodernist thinking; the question of objective reality is a central concern in much of PKD's work.
What made you think ‘I want to write for children?’ Is it a genre you enjoy reading?
I thought about how great I would look in front of gym boyfriend doing my calf presses. I hopped on the seat, pulled the pin out and began to scream "OWIE OWIE OWIE" at the top of my lungs during the peak lunch hour workout time slot. My ankles had snapped back, I thought my achilles tendons had left my body. Gym boyfriend grinned as I turned beet red and contemplated knocking myself out with a dumb bell. Whitney pulled my mangled limbs from the machine that could be used for capitol punishment. I suffered no serious injury, I only looked ridiculous.
Fortunately, Portland now has a 100% solution with the newly-opened Bailey's Taproom, just across Ankeny from the Tugboat downtown. It is smoke-free, centrally-located, has a great list of taps, and serves beer in 20-ounce imperial glasses. That's the superfecta of taprooms!
As we move forward in 2012, the need for a decent residential care and treatment system for NB adults with autism disorders remains as it has over the past decades. The past several decades have been dominated by a community living bureaucracy whose ideas were framed decades ago and which has not moved on to address the need for modern evidence based residential care and treatment needed by some people, including my 16 year old severely autistic son.
Saturday, Kristys sister, Melissa, had the full day planned. First stop was a palm reader. As I am not a believer in this at all, it was interesting to hear everyones reads. Apparently, I have a very strong marriage, I am going to have three kids (a set a twins!!) and they will be all boys haha. oh and I will live to a very old age. haha. It was pretty funny : ) Then we headed to the hawiian nail salon for mani pedis. We ended up being there forever and we were all SO worn out from the night before that the bride wanted to stay in, instead of going out again. Man we are getting old. lol Sunday we had a yummy brunch and made one final stop at Sprinkles for some amazing cupcakes.. The salted caramel one.... to die for! Here are some fun pics from the weekend!
Very early this morning, all my discipline wasn’t working, so I picked up my cell phone and checked Facebook to discover the top two posts on my newsfeed were put there by my daughters.
white lace flower and decided it
I doubt the kids often become bored in their class… there are so many activities for them to choose from. I’m not talking about just toys (the toys are only used when they are in the gym or playing outdoors). They have math stations, stacking blocks, stencils, painting, crayons, water pouring stations, cloth to practice ‘folding’, books, and puzzles… oh the puzzles! There are regular picture puzzles, but also ones where you have to manipulate latches, tie laces, sort sizes, and so much more! It made me want to join in the learning!
to ease our way back into the hustle and bustle of the work week ..
Tips on getting great hair color
Why does everyone from IITs or IIMs or any engineering college, has a story to tell?
Curious, I decided to do a little research—it turns out the “T” shaped tees are an advertising promotion for Gap. All of the shirts mounted to the building are part of a summer t-shirt collection arriving in stores this month.
" We can say with high confidence that the recent heat waves in Texas and Russia, and the one in Europe in 2003, which killed tens of thousands, were not natural events — they were caused by human-induced climate change."
I was 14 freaking years old! That’s just sad, y’all.
And yet is a novel view.
Katie loves the lemon loaf at Starbucks. So when she asked if I would try to replicate it, everything came together: Lemon tree, lemons, mother-in-law, Southern Living, Katie, baking.
Your artist is deep at work. I hope your day is good.
I embossed my card front with an embossing folder by CuttleBug. And I used a scalloped oval punch and hearts from the Clear/Pearl Gem collection. Ribbon was purchased at a craft store. I did have a problem when stamping. I had to re-ink my pad and it was so juicy that I have a couple smears. I hope I hid them well.... So please give a hug to your mama.
St Mary’s Church
This viewpoint really bothers me, especially since it is the published authors who are to blame for it. Unpublished writers didn't figure this out on their own, they were told this by people who have experienced it. But as an author, it's your job to make sure every part of your work is as good as you think it can be before you query it to an agent or an editor. It's a crucial part of your pitch as well, which I'd explained in the aforementioned post. I've discussed this in some of my public query critiques, too.
“You said I could have whatever I wanted, right? So I want to be in a gray jumpsuit because I think that would be cool. Like I’m a badass character in one of my videogames. That’s how I want to look.”
the first band that night was Poco
And Operation rescrewyou whatever should never ever have put that stuff online.
The bus was new, inside the seats recommissioned
Ham,turkey, roast pork, prawns, watermelon salad, tomato salad, normal salad (haha you know what I mean!) potato salad, pasta salad…..
Grandma Shirley's Cucumbers n' Onions recipe written based on a phone conversation with my grandma. (Translation: I had to do some guesswork. If this isn't to your liking, "tweak" the ratios to perfection in your own kitchen.)
three generations old
I created my background by stamping Elegant Fronds on black Bazzill cardstock with Versamark, then embossing with gold embossing powder. Next, I cut the panel apart with Spellbinders™ Edgeabilities® E8-007 Classic Edges One die templates. I glued both pieces to a white Bazzill cardstock panel and added pretty swirly rhinestones. I stamped my Vintage Rose Medallions on white, then cut it out with Nested Oval Medallion Label Dies. I colored the image with Copic Markers and created a small sentiment piece to fit in the center. I used pop-dots to layer my medallion on to my background panel. Lastly, I added a gorgeous burgundy silk ribbon and bow, then adhered it to a black card to finish it off.
I’m more immediately fond of Stephanie: she’s thirty-something, more mature, with an outlandish, though believable, family and a nasty divorce under her belt.
London on the other hand is a fast buzzing metropolis yet at the same time it feels like a series of linked villages. I have grown to love London's noisy ways, her red double decker buses, the green parks and even the drizzle. London keeps me in touch with what is happening in the world... she keeps me on track... and continually moving... The best thing about living between London and Provence... they are only two hours and a bit away from Paris by fast train...
I'll give you what I can find
AHAHA, wrong. Now the unknowns and unplanned items that are never constant. Things like testing, sick clients, vacations, school breaks, paperwork, and parents. Ah parents…coupled with paperwork can be a very potent kick in the buns. Every three months client’s need their paperwork updated. I need to meet at least with the parent to update the paperwork…usually lasts 1.5 hours, not bad. The real problem is tracking down some of these parents. Calling, leaving voice-mails, stopping by the home to leave cards/notices, or even sending courtesy letters. This takes up tons of time and can stress you out.
As usual, the challenge will run for two weeks and there is a fabulous prize to be won again: Two Elphine House Australia stamps. I hope you will join us. :)
Well 12 days after I signed the post nuptial she convinced me that to save my soul I had to divorce her.
The media and Hollywood delight in portraying a belief in eugenics as malevolent and without merit. Which is odd, given that Hollywood and the media are amongst the most fanatical protagonists of modern eugenics.
1/2 teaspoon of salt
And scuttled on out for a nap.
Commodore Kenny was in the control room, observing our team’s interactions. I was exasperated but kept my cool. I realized the failure was mine. We weren’t going to be able to go from top-down management to bottom-up leadership overnight.
- Fireweed Honey from Moon Valley Bees & Botanicals – Deming, WA
Do more Americans need college degrees? 30% of Americans over 25 have a Bachelors degree and a further 10% have an Associates or similar degree. 40% of the population has a degree and that’s the highest it’s ever been, but apparently in order for the United States to grow that number must be higher.
We came nearest to failure, when, owing to your cold (which I hope is no longer troubling you), you had to give up your engagement; and it consequently became necessary for the picture to travel by the same train as yourself. I expect you remember carrying it in my wife’s carpet bag. My brother-in-law tells me that he had only just time to exchange frames from the unglazed to the glazed and hastily to wash his preparation of lamp-black over portions of the canvas to make it appear in need of cleaning, before you arrived in Patmore Street.
Now, you might be thinking, how can extraordinary ability be labeled a deficit? The reality is – and not many folks realize this – the attention deficit experienced by people with ADHD is actually an attention surplus.
As finishing touches, I got rid of the old shower curtain, bought a cute one at Home Goods, got some towels and new bathroom rugs.
But thank you for the prayers and encouragement. We have lots of people standing with us, supporting us. We are grateful.
From Physical Interaction Design to Service Design
77 Swallows and Amazons – Arthur Ransome
I feel like I should say this:
VAL GUEST: He hated Arthur Askey, but he made his directing debut with him in Miss London Ltd, about an escort agency. It probably wasn't that kind of agency,although, you never know - "A handjob Arthur?" "Well stone me!"
We tried to link the above 3 to a wee set.
I love the way some places will wrap the pickle separately, but also inside the same wrapping as the actual sandwich. It’s like a lovely little present. When I’m working all hard and ready to have my midday sustenance, I want my lovely green gem of a pickle.
During “D.A.N.C.E.” – arguably their most successful single – their blinking turntable stage setup split open to reveal an illuminated alcove with a single keyboard where Rosnay had a seat and played out the most elemental melody of the song. This was gradually built back up into a rougher mix with a digitalized bass line, and then finally to a full on pounding dance track. By the end of this musical journey, Justice had elevated the energy so much that the entire venue was going crazy. They did a very good job of expanding their recorded tracks into new places, which is a very admirable thing to see in a live DJ style performance.
I give thanks to Christ Jesus Our Lord, who has given me strength for my work. I thank Him for considering me worthy and appointing me to serve Him, even though in the past I spoke evil of Him and persecuted and insulted Him. But God was merciful to me because I did not yet have faith and so did not know what I was doing. And our Lord poured out His abundant grace on me and gave me the faith and love which are mine in union with Christ Jesus. This is a true saying, to be completely accepted and believed: Christ Jesus came into the world to save sinners. I am the worst of them, but God was merciful to me in order that Christ Jesus might show His full patience in dealing with me, the worst of sinners, as an example for all those who would later believe in him and receive eternal life. To The Eternal King, Immortal and Invisible, The only wise God-to Him be honour and glory forever and ever! Amen!
Just one quick game…
The pair of hands at my boobs moved down and grabbed my hips. I obligingly lowered them and felt another cock begin to slide into my pussy. I quickly got myself into a rhythm; back, slowly impaling myself on the cock underneath me, forward, taking as much of the other cock into my mouth as was possible.
In 711 AD when the moors overran the south of Spain, they changed bullfighting significantly by introducing horse-mounted fighters. It all changed again in the 1700's, when they did away with the horse mounted fighters, and they became the matadors as we know them today.
Subject: Top this for a speeding ticket...
For depriving us in many cases, of the benefits of Trial by Jury:
Venturing into the real world, we can speculate about, even investigate, the actual identities and motives of the suicide bombers.
that big of deal to you, however if you could feel
Went to the mid-night premiere last night!
I usually travel overseas but my friend and I are busy so we’ll wait a year. She’s off to Mexico, me to Winchester. I’ve never been there before so I’ll need to pay attention so I don’t overshoot the junction, overstep the mark on the map for the venue.
You will not see the word ‘Borders.’
Point of fashion: looking good and feeling comfy for a casual tea-date
And while the middle and lower-middle class still has a small voice, the poor have been all but forgotten, by EVERYONE. No one speaks of the poor anymore, because they have no political capital and vote in small numbers. We need to re-engage everyone in this country in a national discourse about how to best move forward in a utilitarian way.
I've been really struggling with my emotions lately and I'm still praying that is has a lot to do with hormones which I hope will start leveling out. Without saying everything that I've been feeling, which I really don't think would be appropriate, I do want to say that I've been having mixed feelings about this journey. I've been questioning whether I'm making the right decision or not. I've been feeling a bit resentful of how ill I've been feeling and how it's affected my children and husband. I never felt this way for my last journey and I know it all seems a little late to be feeling this way now.
Look out for the full post tomorrow…
to be published in On Campus Magazine
Suzan
expletives for: Golly gosh darn! My blasted stinking shock mount broke!
Referring to the statement of prosecution witnesses and check-in registers, the Judge ruled these “leave no manner of doubt that visits of Kamaljit Singh to Chandigarh and his short stays, after coming late evening and leaving by next day, could not possibly be in connection with any business activity and rather were with the sole object of meeting Harpreet Kaur…”.
So I am going to introduce you a typical home remedy that Koreans, at least in my household, use when we get sick from those mean viruses.
I am nearing the end of my staycation, which started last Wednesday. Back to work on Thursday. I accomplished one goal, cut out a pendant with my saw and etch it. The other goal--make a bunch of stuff--not so much. At all. But I did get a bunch of pants.
5. What are you looking forward to in May?
It is graceful and great to get to glory,
The film is “Race to Execution,” and the speaker is Frank Thompson, who supervised Oregon’s most recent executions in 1996 and 1997 while superintendent of the Salem prison. Thompson, who is retired, has announced his opposition to the death penalty.
And the child's face pales with terror,
This Friday morning I made him a tuna sandwich. I made one can, which makes two sandwiches for us. Rather than have to wrap up the second one, I ate it for breakfast.
Oklahoma State
We followed the recipe exactly and it was so delicious!!! Perhaps next time we will experiment a little more, start out with some bacon, maybe pearl onions, dash of tomato paste, rosemary and bay leaf. A shot of Cognac or brandy would be a nice addition also.
1 No Surrender
So I am getting quite tired of hearing rather sexist comments which are probably prompted by my youthfulness, why can't people give me a chance?
Toadies
Please message me with any questions or variations! These are so simple and can be made ahead or right before your meal. All can be frozen to be used at a later date (freeze for up to 6 weeks).
My Sweet Hunter,
There seems to be so many people around me struggling...my dear friend who is battling cancer, my sister, our youth pastor is struggling with health problems....so much hardship...so much worry...I seem to cry at the drop of a hat lately...and just so you know I don't cry easily.
Enter Deepak Mohan Rao.
You may have seen this video making the rounds today. It's an audio track of Pastor Sean Harris of Berean Baptist Church in Fayetteville, North Carolina telling his congregation to punch their children and break their bones if they exhibit any sign of behavior not gender specific.
- Back to My Mac doesn’t work for the first 5 minutes after rebooting
Listen to an audio book.
I'd like to dedicate this card to a wonderful woman, Janelle Hayes, who lost her battle with a brain tumour on Thursday. I 'met' Janelle through her blog Show and Tell, which I loved not only for its inspiring creativity but also because her lively personality shone through it. I will really miss her.
For me, I think I’m going to bake a lemon cake, because my sister loves lemon cake with vanilla frosting, topped with any sort of chocolate. Since I don’t happen to click pictures of a lot of things I cook, I Googled ‘lemon cake with vanilla frosting’ and selected this one, which is quite close to what I’ll be making tomorrow.
4.) If you could visit anywhere in the world, where would you go?
- Mention of verbal abuse from docs (a real, unacceptable issue) which was immediately undercut by stupid "paramedic is cute" comment.
That was such a sad part of the movie. Poor Janie...
One big change that the Mayan books suggest, he said, is space travel. “This planet is not designed for seven billion people,” he said. “These sacred books will encourage humans to explore and colonize other planets, just like the Mayans did.”
Also, whiskey.
5. Using a home water filtration system allows you to have unlimited access to fresh and pure potable water. It could also help you get rid of different chemicals like chlorine in the tap water, thus ensuring that you water tastes fresher and cleaner.
Immediately after the dreadful experience we put our clothes back on and sat in shock.
That was the beginning of my understanding that all matters sexual were never to be spoken of in my little slice of Chaardom. They were the worst of all the deadly sins.
The painted toys you bought for me, are filled with tears and frowns.
If that happens, we are officially living under a tyranny.
After hemming and hawing about making the full time transition from vegetarian to vegan, I finally decided to try a month of vegan-ish fare to see how we do. I say "vegan-ish" as I'm eliminating dairy and eggs but probably not honey (and I'm not going to go crazy checking bread and the like for dairy ingredients...though, I did check the bread we use 95% of the time and we're in the clear there.) Let's call it a plant strong diet a la Forks Over Knives. Carlos and I are fully invested while the kids are still partaking in their morning yogurt and occasional slice of cheese.
I have so many things that I have thought about posting on here this school year - it may take me a little while to catch up! Look for another post and some freebies soon!
And that's all for today, folks! Have you read Embrace yet? What did you think of Jessica's interview questions? Don't you agree that she's such a lucky girl to have landed the One In A Million Teenage Love Story that everyone dreams about? ;)
Grandpa is doing OK. He's BORED out of his mind. Which is to be expected. I see him every day, some times twice a day.
I didn’t do that great at that race. I had a good start but went down very early after bouncing off a couple trees. I got up and then followed a guy off the course where there was ribbon down and no arrows. I was now very far behind my class and I kept getting stopped by people in front of me bobbling and cutting me off. It was partially my fault for not taking different lines. I didn’t need help from anyone though, as I found plenty of placed to crash on my own. The 100 yard long, off camber, slick-as-ice mudhole was a favorite. The first lap I lost my rear brakes after tangling with a guy stuck on a hill that I was trying to get around. I was so beat after one lap I wanted to quit but I kept trudging along to the end. I didn’t get all the laps in but I finished and salvaged some points.
Every time I have a crisis in my day to day living I think to myself, “Oh God, how am I going to make it through?” I try to have faith in God and trust him to the best of my ability. I pray. I try to give it to Christ each time, but sometimes this old flesh tries to take over. Because God is with me, I manage to survive.
On to the other 'stuff'..
She has a great figure and she actually exercises when she's in aerobics. She'll even sweat. I make half-hearted moves and glare at the instructor when she wants us to "Woo-woo!" I am not a "Woo-woo-er."
West Virginia is known as the Mountain State, a region of forests, gorges and hollows rather than the flat plains of the American midwest. That kind of topography influences these stories that might be said to share the theme of stasis vs the need to escape. They are peopled by ordinary men and women with ordinary hopes and fears; coal miners, boatmen, labourers, fighters. The huge success of these stories and one factor that makes them so influential to other writers is highlighted by Andre Dubus III in his excellent new afterword.
About the athor: Born in Buchans, Newfoundland, Crummey grew up there and in Wabush, Labrador, where he moved with his family in the late 1970s. He went to university with no idea what to do with his life and, to make matters worse, started writing poems in his first year. Just before graduating with a BA in English he won the Gregory Power Poetry Award. First prize was three hundred dollars (big bucks back in 1987) and it gave him the mistaken impression there was money to be made in poetry.
The least reliable provinces were the Northern Cape (where 17 of 30 calls failed to go through) and the North West, with only one of the 10 stations available on all three occasions it was called.
We can't do that now, as Nippit needs her turn out. If let Nippit out when Dammit is out she goes right for hind quarters. Just like the furious little Nippit she is.
Games During Dinner
“Rapidly-changing content consumption patterns are pushing the publishers and information service providers to transform into Digital Enterprises. Digital Enterprises provide dynamic content as product, produced through a flexible Digital Workflow, and transacted using Digital Business and Delivery systems. There is an urgent need for firms to transform into Digital Enterprises and fully exploit the opportunities provided by the digital world. Our Digital Publishing Platform provides a central foundation to the firms for their digital transformation journey,” said Kamal Bhadada, Global Head of Media and Information Services industry vertical, TCS.
Anyways, in my lusty haze on Saturday, I dove towards the tote to grab the first thing I saw and it just so happened to be my vintage toy. I had to crank my, ah-hem, choke but once I had the, ah-hem, engine running, my vibrator blissfully revved the RPMs.
Projected as light graffiti the gorilla portrait breathes nocturnal life into the unreal world. Huge fronts cry for attention. Grotesque steel giants wait for a character.
Next to whizz in was Sandra H, with this charming card. Do please go and see if you haven't done so already - and while you're there, take note of such a clever idea - I've had my nose pressed against the laptop screen here and I'm pretty sure the embossing folder that Sandra used is little flowers. Yup, just had another peek and it is - but what a great idea to colour the centres of the flowers using Pro Markers - it really makes them 'pop' and I think it's a tip to store up for future use don't you think? Brilliant Sandra!
A popular Government, without popular information, or the means of acquiring it, is but a prologue to a Farce or a Tragedy; or perhaps both. Knowledge will forever govern ignorance: And a people who mean to be their own Governors, must arm themselves with the power which knowledge gives.
I think I'll wait to see what the next couple of stitches are before I start stitching on the actual sampler. I'll do some more swatch work with the next two installments to get a feel for the threads, see how the colors are ranging. I may end up using all different colors and not stick to the monochromatic-with-an-accent scheme I'm considering right now. It will be my own little crazy quilt of a design. At some point I'll have to come up with a sashing and border concept I suppose.
This is Eli having a very good time:
Is it ok to not think things through all the time, when I only mean well in everything I do?
Me: I HATE that! There's no excuse for dropping litter.
oxooxoxooxoxooxoxoxooxoxox!!!
If that all sounds rather bleak, I'm sorry. I don't want the blog to become all about negatives.
According to Lee, who doesn’t seem to be hooked on phonics, Pilot is named after a song called, “He’s Simple, He’s Dumb, He’s the Pilot.” I guess Lee doesn’t have very high expectations for his son. Somehow I see this kid making his dad’s life a living hell when he gets older.
New York City, New York, USA
Regina Roff designs book covers for Bloomsbury/Walker, and she was the one who created the final version of Lauren Baratz-Logstead's Little Women and Me (read that Cover Story from Lauren's POV).
Here is my card….and how to create the layer.....
To check out all the DT creations and the details of the challenge just click on the blinkie below..
Why should I have to be famous or like everyone else
My husband Alberto and I have gone through a lot since that photo shoot. It is sweet for us to see ourselves in the pages of Undecorate, again a frozen moment of time, happy and healthy standing on our front porch surrounded by the lush greenery, vastly enjoying the company of the entire Dwell team that also surrounded us. They are a very lovely and loving group of people. All of those ferns in the photo, froze and died in one bad winter after the shoot, and in a way Alberto froze and died one winter in Calgary. But the lush garden has come back, and so has Alberto. We still feel the love from the Dwell team, and from all the bloggers who pulled us through that winter."
There is a time when God will no longer repeat Himself, when second chances are over. When that time comes, will you be ready? What if it is tomorrow? What if it is today? Are you ready?
I needn't have worried,Chef managed to find a discreet parking position for the pick up..
You have until Sunday at midnight in order to be in the drawing for prizes!! We have three goody bags that we'll randomly draw for!! What's inside?? Oh... only a stamp set, a pack of paper and some of the most luscious ribbon EVER!!! So, get those creative juices flowing and let's see what you've got!
proving by experience that
drummers. I was given one half hour of sweat driven dance
There is always a sacrifice, a price to pay, though. That could be quitting a day job as some have done to work at a home office so that they could be with their children during the day. Some work at night. Some do with less income.
Two men were taken to the hospital after a collision on Highway 26 Sunday night, one of them with serious injuries. Oregon State Police is investigating what caused the collision.
As I mentioned in America's Failed Russian Putsch , the American actions are acts of war, blatant acts of war. If it came to light that Russia, China or Germany had flooded one or another of the US parties with foreign cash, the scandal would never quiet down and that same Jabbering fool McCain would be singing "Bomb, bomb (fill in nation's name)".
The last game got pushed to Friday because of a rain out earlier in the week and that was just fine because then we could actually go out like big kids and be festive with the drinking of spirits and such. It was not quite as heart stopping as the game the night before and we were also a tad worn down from staying up so late watching said game and then dragging ourselves to work the next day BUT it was still a great game- and who cares how it all went down- they won the World Freaking Series!
More verses.
I went up stairs to my bedroom, pulled my pink pajamas from my dresser and walked over to the window. I stood there looking out into the dark night; the air was thick with the misty fog rising above the cold water of the creek beyond the back of the yard, so much that I could barely make out the edge of the trees of the forest on the side of the yards. I could hear the muffled voice of my father as he spoke with Uncle Oud. His voice got a little louder, and then I heard the click of the door closing to the kitchen. I walked back over to my bed, sat down and started to change into my pajamas. I didn’t really understand why things seemed so different between Pops and Uncle Howard. They always seemed to be mad at each other now.
Mr Heart is going to be cooking the meal tonight and hopefully I can play with a few more bits of card and paper whilst he gets on with it!!
~Mental Preparedness
Bratleys 0
Professor Kuruvilla George is also the state's deputy chief psychiatrist and one of a group of 150 doctors who wrote to a Senate inquiry on marriage equality. The doctors' submission argued children with a mother and father were healthier than children with same-sex parents.
The idea for the resolution was brought to the council by Jordan McNeish, a 23-year-old activist formerly involved with the Occupy Charlottesville movement who has since founded a local chapter of the National Organization for the Reform of Marijuana Laws. McNeish has openly acknowledged that he has had past legal trouble involving marijuana possession.
Stir with ice in a mixing glass. Strain into a chilled whiskey glass or other smallish glass. Garnish with an orange twist.
Not only do I love the look, but I love the price, and with Sawyer's room having odd windows (one is regular, and the other is a smaller dormer window). The dormer window cannot hold a regular rod and have it look normal. When we moved in the room had hunter green plastic mini blinds. They served their purpose, but they were ugly. Here is a picture from the week we moved in which shows just how ugly they are....
I asked the man for a 'bushy' tree
It was a very long day. You know, just one of those days. After working all day (from 8-6) dealing with children at my private school who are emotionally disturbed and basically incapable of appearing to give a shit...I was needless to say, just simply burnt out. I picked the wee woman up and on our drive home I turned on the radio attempting to decompress. I drove slowly along the long winding road towards my destination and tried to immerse myself in the music, allowing myself to clear any tension from the draining day I had previously experienced.
Monday and Tuesday were crazy days at school and I was ready for a "me" day. So I took Wednesday off from school. I had lunch with my sister and baby Charlotte and I told her how I felt queezy and still hadn't gotten my period. She said we should go home and take another test. So off I went to pee in a cup and then fed my sweet niece her bottle. I was pretty positive it would be negative again, so I was pretty nonchalant. As I finished up Charlotte's bottle I walked into the bathroom and found the test saying "Positive".
When transgender inclusion has been discussed in other women’s spaces, it’s fairly common to see strong opposition based on prejudice and ignorance. It is remarkable that no such voice has emerged within WFTDA. On the contrary, the Philly Rollergirls have emerged as vocal critics of WFTDA’s Gender Policy arguing that it isn’t inclusive enough and that it “may potentially lead to wide-reaching problems regarding hormone testing,” leading to possible “witch hunts.” In June 2011, at the East Coast Derby Extravaganza, volunteers from the Philly Rollergirls asked participants to sign a petition asking WFTDA not to implement the gender policy as written and furthermore asked rollergirls in support of their petition to wear temporary tattoos with the transgender pride symbol to show solidarity with their cause. Hundreds of rollergirls responded favorably to their cause, and transgender pride tattoos were visible everywhere you looked—on arms, faces, even cleavage. It was a heartening sight that brought me to tears more than once. It began healing the anger I had harbored for so long from the witch-hunt that I had faced within my own league. The atmosphere their protest created made ECDX 2011 the first time I ever felt comfortable talking publicly about being transgender with other rollergirls, coming out to many DC Rollergirls for the first time and also sharing stories with other out transgender rollergirls including Rita “Jacquelyn Heat” Kelly from Philly and Melanie “Nameless Whorror” Pasztor from Montreal.
He has been diagnosed with a malignant Neuroendocrine tumor. It's very rare in that only .5 percent of malignancies are this kind. That's 1-3 people per 100,000. Insane.
Fresh thyme- 1/2 tsp (chopped) (dried is fine as well)
“Oh. He obviously likes you.”
Bimini via Green Turtle Cay, her ticket said. Closest to Florida, Bimini was considered American—until you got there. So retro. Two stops and she’d be there. Her spirit rose as they headed out from Abaco.
At this point, man had unbroken fellowship with God. Adam and Eve could enter into the presence of God and enjoy Him. Nothing was between them and their Creator. They had become so close to God their Father that God planted a special garden and placed them in it.
Fall in love
This has to stop. MAS cannot continue such privileges. Neither could they have half price for Government pensioners. They just can't afford it now.
14. Saying they love my book while they squeeze my leg and roam their hands up towards my wallet.
While I was there, I snapped a few pictures of things that caught my eye. Maps are so cool - especially big ones! I could see this framed out or dry mounted and hung on a large wall in maybe a masculine office space or den. Love the picture lights too.
h/t to a reader
Sponsor: Danny’s Farm Mobile Petting Zoo featuring Penelope the Pig
Legend has it that Squama is a prosperity drawing and spiritual and mentally grounding stone. It helps you to center yourself mental and spiritual and it provides a field of protection. It also very calming and rids negativity.Aventurine Facts: Green Bluish Aventurine has a Mohs Hardness of 7 and a chemical composition of : (Al,Fe3+)7O3(BO3)(SiO4)3 K(Al,Cr)2AlSi3O10(OH)2Legend has it that Aventurine is a prosperity stone. It solidifies leadership, decision making skills , encourages compassion, empathy, creativity independence, career success, balance and the ability to persevere. It relaxes nerves and lessens stammering
We've had some extra family staying with us lately so it's been great to be able to prepare meals for everyone and then all sit down together to eat. I know they enjoy it and I feel good at having shown love through food. Such a nice thing. I've even been cooking lunches on the weekends, something I never usually did.
171 Latrobe Terrace
That's my 5 for today folks! We have dinner guests coming tonight, so I am off to the kitchen to try some new recipes today..... appetizer tonight is Spinach & Artichoke Dip! Don't worry.... I'll post the review on that one soon too!
*Hopefully it's one of those! (with a smile)
My interest in the Arab Awakening deepened from the surprising observation that average Americans and the American media were suddenly spellbound by events that qualified as world news but were not natural or man-made disasters. As a European in the U.S., one of my first realizations about American culture was a certain degree of isolationism and a lack of interest in the world beyond borders.
Choices:
Are you getting the general idea? Like I say, they’re not particularly original – in fact my tastes evidently lean very heavily towards the romantic and mythologised when it comes to water – and they’re not my own work. But each one takes my breath away. Some people like cars, some people like cats (please!), some people completely lose it over a lovely room setting. I say screw rooms, we’re animals, we’re meant to be in the wild. (If you saw my house you might think I actually do live in the wild. I need a housekeeper.)
And spent the next two weeks shaking off and on from sheer rage at what happened and fright you would hurt yourself. But I didn’t have you to wrap my arms around so I would stop shaking.
Once they were older, I began having someone come in and clean. I totally forgot what a cleaning routine was all about.
* Costco
I want an apology.
Linda is getting a new car (through her company, I think… it’s a Ford Fusion that she had to order in Illinois) and when she gets it she would sell me her Subaru Outback (1998 and very well maintained) at a good price. I checked to see if this was a car that could get beyond the 250,000 miles that are on it and, from all I’ve read so far, in well-maintained condition this could get twice that amount of mileage and still be running. With my rate of driving (about 12,000 miles a year) I’d probably be long dead before that amount of miles was hit. The only problem here is that Linda doesn’t know when her new car will get here… it may take a couple more weeks, which would leave me in my carless condition for longer than I wanted. However, I’ll deal with it as well as I can.
‘Alright, what did you say?’ Felicity demanded. Something told her she had been mentioned.
Of course, maybe not.
After complaining of the quality of the food, which they had rejected after just tasting it, the couple stood up and headed for the front door but were blocked by another of the restaurant owners. “He pushed me around and told me to go back to my table and pay for what I had ordered. "There was nothing I could do as I am 78 and I am on crutches, so I was defenceless,” said Peter Stiff. The owners then summoned the police. The uniformed cops then ordered the couple to "pay for the meal they had ordered or be arrested."
really incredible.
pen in mouth-straight line stocking pout.
Love is wide, love is long
I just got lense addict lol
Cheerio for now ... tick tock.
1201 **D-II/7/1995. “The Story of Cain and Abel.” The Malcolm Pitman Sharp Memorial Lecture, Rosary College, River Forest, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1998(12), above, pp. 548-64.) See Item D-X/5/1980, above.
If you are at a wedding with Carolyn, you will be required to take 1 zillions photos. Chances are, people neither of you know will some how make it into your photo shoot. Like this gent pictured. No idea who that is.
33And the children of Israel were pleased about this; and they gave praise to God, and had no more thought of going to war against the children of Reuben and the children of Gad for the destruction of their land.
I spent about two hours with my dad going over photos and I smiled the whole time. I felt like I was getting a better picture of my family and I loved every second of it (and yes, the was pun intended. Partially). I also got to see photos of myself I didn’t even know existed. There was one night in particular that I was going over our family photos by myself. I landed on the batch of me on my first birthday…
Mainland China is one important source of immigrants for Singapore, but we are not getting their cream of the crop.
I am forcing myself to remember the bad so I stop remembering the good. I have started journaling outside of this blog and was writing our history and I tagged something interesting in my memory.
We all deserve love and respect based on who we are, not on someones ignorant and hateful definition of who they think we are. I cannot accept, will not accept, will not support any political hopeful who wants to exclude human beings from society based on lives different than their own. Different does not equate with wrong.
For the first time in the American movie history, a completely unworthy movie has been awarded one of the most coveted awards that an often time is denied to the best of the best.
The grand age of 11
“It’s not like I have a choice.” He looked around nervously, but apart from a faint shimmer around Pevan’s head, there was nothing to worry about. If that was all her disapproval, then either the Sherim was quiet today or she secretly approved. And Pevan never approved of anything he did, even when it was obviously the right thing to do. At least a quiet Sherim meant it was safe to talk for a moment or two.
If the cheese is neufchâtel
Being in lazy blogger mode, I'm going to play the occasional Re-up card and pitch in a couple o' home-made comps you may have missed. Two acoustic autumnal mixes of slow burning smokey smoulderers..
Global Research articles are used as source material by college and university students. Moreover, numerous universities, libraries and research institutions have established a link to Global Research on their respective web sites.
Enjoy your day, and thanks for sharing a bit of yours with me :)
"What is four million rand? It gives a very blunt message that we don't care about Africa. We need to make a strong commitment and tell the AU we need you guys to come. Africa is not poor, our thinking may be poor."
(The sleep sack is really quite cute and I feel frustrated that the photos don't do it justice - every wrinkle is highlighted - in real life it doesn't look at all wrinkled - it looks soft and cosy. Does anyone have any photography tips for taking pictures of fabric?)
Tavistock is a lovely little town,
We continued walking into the dramatic setting. Icicles were being warmed by the sun, and as they melted, they lost their grip on the cliffs above and came crashing down. At first I thought they were pretty far from the trail, but I realized that I was stepping over some broken icicles on the trail as big around as my arm.
What are you currently lusting over? What am I missing out on?
So, it’s been almost a week since I posted last. My sincere apologies for those of you who are really digging this blog. Work got really busy but blogging is just something you have to be purposeful about. I continued to make strong choices last week through working lunches. Another side note is I helped a friend move last week. I noticed how much stronger I felt. Moving heavy furniture wasn’t a big deal for me. As a friend of mine mentioned yesterday, it’s not getting any easier. I’m just getting stronger.
How can I let Jesus run rampant, as it were, in my mind? How can I let his anchoring reality sink into me so deeply that I feel his palpable presence around me, holding me, guiding me? How can I open my eyes to see his work in our home, lives, and surroundings? How can I keep him at the center of my mind, growing in strength and power, his life in me becoming a threat to injustice, inequality and evil?
Ng TP, Foo SC, Yoong T. Risk of spontaneous abortion in workers exposed to toluene. Br J Ind Med 1992; 49: 804-808.
I’m thankful my parents knew Christ and took me to church each Sunday. At six I sat in a Sunday evening service and listened to the pastor. He gave the Gospel and told about a man who failed to believe. Later the man died and went to hell. For the first time, I realized I was a sinner and burst into tears. Mom thought I was too young to grasp redemption, but I wasn’t. I didn’t have all the theology down, but I knew I wanted to be forgiven. That night I accepted Christ.
Possible: “The Keeper” – Chris Cornell (Original Song)
And the house.
“Images for Integration: The Pied Piper leads his merry band of youths to the amphitheatre on the hill for an afternoon of music lessons, philosophical teachings and baseball…A young man goes abroad to attend university and becomes a foreign correspondent.”
The temple that was referred to in Hebrews as “not being made with hands” and” not of this creation” was indeed an invisible, spiritual temple, was it not? And are we not told that the Most Holy is itself in heaven, which was the most significant part of that temple? I guess I’m not seeing any other way, according to the context of Hebrews, how not made with hands could be understood other than a spiritual existence. Sure, it was made by God and not by man, but Adam and the rest of creation were made by God and not by man and I would think one would be hard pressed to say that Adam and the rest of the universe are “not of this creation”.
Got one turkey soaking in brine for the smoker tonight and the other is still thawing (SLOWLY) in the fridge for the oven in the morning. It may get a bath in brine overnight. I don't know. Robb's the turkey man. I still need to make a cheesecake and rolls... Will it get done? I'm almost to the point of 'eh'.
Our birdhouses were presented to the school where we meet during last night's meeting and the headteacher was really thrilled. In fact she included them in assembly this morning as well (I was able to attend as I am off today) and all the Brownies that go to the school got up and showed them off, it was quite sweet how proud they were of them.
All you need to solve economic woes
MEMENTO FOR YOU: Liwan (fifth right) receives a souvenir from a representative of Kampung Na’ah while Dennis (left), Torstein (second right), Lihan (third right), Ose (fourth right) and Wan Saging (right) look on.
Just to hammer home how effective teleological fiction is at impressing upon people certain ideas about history, let me share with you a final comment my uncle made to me:
I can’t begin to explain the overwhelming feelings of frustration and despair I experienced watching tonight’s game.
Tuesday evening, sharing a pot luck super, really lovely, even if it did take forever to cook, while we got use to the mechanics of making a fire suitable for cooking over. TIP: plonking a HUGE piece of wood on the firepit is not the way. Oooh I did love cooking over the campfire though; it was well christianed!
Meanwhile, growth in all the major eurozone economies slowed to near zero, indicating a renewal of the recession that began at the end of 2007. The British economy also slipped into stagnation. This renewed slowdown is partly the result of fears about a sovereign debt meltdown and banking crisis, but more especially the result of austerity measures that have cut demand and reinforced the spiral of weak demand, falling investment, and rising unemployment. This in turn reduces government tax revenues, and actually leads to bigger deficits.
About an hour ago, I was looking for a mirror, with brackets, at a parts store. It wasn't the first I visited. In fact, it was the last one I had to choose from; the others didn't have what I needed.
All the bands like ran late so we were coming up on almost 10:30 and HU still wasn’t playing. This concerned me quite a bit cause usually venues make the show stop at 11 but I guess since this place was up in the middle of the woods it didn’t count.
The neighbour muttered something under her breath and rushed down the stairs. Neither one of us was ready to go downstairs, leaving the others.
Our incredible hostesses also asked us to tell what we love about May. ﻿A number of years ago, I would have told you the thing I love most about May would be the end of the school year! I absolutely loved having our three children home - I lived for summer vacation even more than they did. But alas, they are all grown up now and so the end of school no longer holds the same appeal it once did for me. So I guess I will say the warmer temperatures and the opportunity to open windows and bring the outside in.
The global community would recognize that the economy is a subset of the environment, not the other way around. The hubris of humanity, that our objective of endless economic growth is somehow superior than the ideal of living in harmony with our world, would be a thing of the past.
At about 6:20, Lehrer asked Horner for general observations on where lobbying money goes.
She really loved our story and she invited us to be guests on their new show.
Gerard A. Barbara, 53, New York, N.Y.
on the swinging former man
the late-march brooding has long subsided.
So attention all you pathetic little insecure females: The problem isn’t US. The problem is YOU and your lack of self-confidence, not to mention your very poor choice in male partners. Now please go work on your self-esteem issues and stop acting like a cat in heat every time you and your jackwagon of a man are in the vicinity of another woman. It’s incredibly disgusting and sad.
(1997), these will tilt the balance of power toward whoever has the best ability to see... including ability to detect mosquito-cams! Our only hope in such a world is NOT to ban the things - that cannot conceivably work. But to make sure we all have them. And hence that we can catch the peeping toms.
Pay $1.99, get back $2 RR
Territory: This is a young male that is yet to establish his own territory, and as such still utilises the territory in which his was born; but as he gets older his father (Argyle male) will push him out and he will have to look for a territory of his own. There is a lack of males in the south and east, so it is hoped that this male will move into one of those gaps. Vyeboom Dam male is named after a large dam on the Nhlaralumi, right on the northern boundary of the Timbavati, where he frequently hangs out. This leopard is often seen around Motswari camp and the rest of Motswari’s property and Argyle. Vyeboom Dam male also spends a lot of time on Ingwelala just north of the Timbavati.
Interpublic denies the claims.
and then point them towards the world,
Phil's "good side". :)
“People go around in their pyjamas?” says one of them disappointedly, perhaps realising that handing out hugs on a main thoroughfare in Dublin isn’t as uber-crazy as she had hoped.
Sixteen year old Kaylee has a secret. When she's near to someone who is about to die, she knows it - and she can barely contain the earsplitting scream that instinctively rises up in her throat. And once she starts screaming... she can't stop. The first time it happened, she was labelled crazy and prescribed drugs to eradicate her so-called panic attacks. But this time is different. In a crowded club, she spots a girl that has that darkness about her. By the next morning, the girl is dead. And only schoolmate Nash seems to be able to help her work out what exactly is going on.
Speaking of the experience of the suffering country and the brave militaries that fight every day, Cheryl told Daily Mail: “Afghanistan was an unbelievable experience. The whole trip was incredible. The men and women I met out there were inspirational, and so amazingly brave and dedicated.”
To get the best colour, I like to mix the colour of paint with a white base of foodcolour. Again, Ameicolour white is essential to get good colours. You don't need it, but you will find that it will give a clearer look to the painting.
A positive cause, still little noticed by high officials and the media, is the by now well-established effort to build or rebuild local economies, starting with economies of food. This effort to connect cities with their surrounding rural landscapes has the advantage of being both attractive and necessary. It rests exactly upon the recognition of human limits and the necessity of human scale. Its purpose, to the extent possible, is to bring producers and consumers, causes and effects, back within the bounds of neighborhood, which is to say the effective reach of imagination, sympathy, affection, and all else that neighborhood implies. An economy genuinely local and neighborly offers to localities a measure of security that they cannot derive from a national or a global economy controlled by people who, by principle, have no local commitment.
But before I do, I just wanna say, I’ve waited for this movie since like, last year.
While they were bonding, I left the kitchen to tend to some other 'to do's' on my list. I listened to them laughing and smiled to myself...although it was a short lived smile. You see, I overheard "Elizabeth, you're such a pot head!" Well, it's one of those moments when, in your mind you've already decided the reasoning behind such a statement - he'd obviously been watching shows on television that we didn't approve of. I was uspet and made my way to the kitchen to let him know that in our house we don't call people names at all, let alone names with reference to drugs. Yes, I had it all planned in less than ten seconds.
I took this picture in my kitchen with my Canon EOS Rebel XSi EF-S 18-55IS SLR digital camera with Canon Speedlite 430EX II flash. I placed a white poster board sheet on to my small, metal supply shelf, attaching one end at the bottom of one level and letting it curve down and rest on the lower level. This gave me a background with a graduated blend (i.e. you can't see a crease as the back "wall" transitions to be the "floor"). I covered the back of the shelf with a white bed sheet to somehow increase the ambient light within the shelf. A small desk lamp helped shine some light on my subjects. This was a pretty ghetto light booth.
This situation typically arises when the product has existed for some time in the marketplace, but is not doing as well as it should. Marketers don’t really understand what task this product is being used for and which other tasks could be connected with the product. In this situation some key customers should be tracked down (for example those who have recently increased purchase significantly, bought the product at some inconvenience or have stopped buying) and investigated through ethnography based market research tools.
The point is this: the good news Paul proclaimed to the Corinthians (and we assume he did likewise to other peoples in other places) is essentially the story of Jesus. Paul’s gospel was the sequence of events that, in this telling, begins with Jesus’ death, continues through his burial, resurrection, appearance, and ascension.
Sourcebooks, May 1 2012, $6.99
4. We will not do any cleaning other than cleaning up after meals.
But you’re goddamn right I’m writing for the money. I’m not writing some little unknown novella, my books will NOT be lost on a bookshelf in a dusty back-alley book store. I’m writing a goddamn best seller, and I refuse to say “Oh, because the odds are against me, I will accept mediocrity.”
But, tumbleweeds in California are like pigeons in New York city. They are everywhere to the point where if you didn’t know, you’d assume they owned the place. Wifesy tells me they are sage brush. Dried out, sage brush, I suppose. Never mind that I never see this “sage brush” actually implanted in the ground. I never walk by something and go, “Oh, what pretty sage brush” – in fact, I don’t think I’ve ever seen this brush anywhere except dried up, balled together, and coming straight for the grill of my car. So, my guess is that these tumbleweeds fall from the heavens. It’s god’s version of ‘space invaders’. She drops the tumbleweeds and guffaws as multiple cars on the California highways try to dodge them without hitting each other. Yep, tumbleweeds are god’s video game. God is having a laugh.
I've been fiddling with Swan playset designs for a long time. It's always a goal when I design a playset that the entire set be able to fold up into one carrying case. With so much going on in the Swan this was a challenge....but based on these rough mock-ups using scrap Dida parts I think it will all fit inside and still have maximum play value. We shall see. I've only now finished up the art and sent it for printing.
And how I will always think about it,
Check your stores for a display of New Keebler Fudge Bars with FREE after Rebate forms attached. I found these forms on a cardboard display at Walmart, but saw the empty display at another store over the weekend.
So, until now, my digi experimentation has been limited to printing out digi items and using them in projects. Well this month, I decided it was time to wander out of my comfort zone and play with my PhotoShop Elements some. Here's what I did:
And speaking of Bitty,
Piers Pigou, the director of the SA History Archives (SAHA), said he believed the presidency was lying.
Of all the pleasure mankind derives from tormenting their fellow man, nowhere is this as prolific as with children. They mock their peers, they taunt and tease, ostracize and invent demeaning songs.
Two:
Powder - LA Translucent
return all of them to france as most will have come thru that country, let the eu masters sort it because our lunatic MPs cant
My planesleep has become less frequent ever since I was groped by a male passenger while I slept on an overnight flight a few years ago. The crew on the plane were very good in their handling of the whole fiasco, but needless to say I know have an additional in flight security procedure that involves building a miniature barricade between myself and the person next to me - particularly since the crew told me this was not an entirely infrequent occurence, particularly when dealing with travellers of a certain ethnicity. I digress...
We can see that the path of the eclipse point and Jupiter on the ASC is mainly focused on India, Kazakhstan and Russia. It seems that this eclipse will not have an immediate effect on Europe or on the United States of America.
Rob Roensch (US) – The Wild Flowers of Baltimore
Richard also believes there's a hearts and minds battle being waged --roughly connected to Carol Rosin's claims of Werner Von Braun's belief that certain elements in the military/industrial/entertainment complex want to create fear of an alien invasion-- "fearporn" is Richard's term-- to poison the well and keep people locked in a limited, hopeless worldview.
The lesson here is: Don’t try to put one over on your community. You’ll get found out, and it will hurt you. It’s better to just be honest. And Be a Person.
Now a fourth appeared, much heavier, sloppier, and I was closer now, close enough to see them give each other the side-eye, as some signal seemed to pass through them. They each moved slightly, nodding at each other and looking toward me, forming a line across the only entrance to the narrow trail and, once in place, turned almost at once and faced me, looking directly AT me now, and not toward me and that’s when my being seemed to seize. I glanced at Jamoka to my left and he was not wagging his tail, which to me was a sure sign that he had a bad vibe. I wondered how Jamoka would protect me from 5 men.
(Spoken)
WordPress version 3.0.5 is already in the market.
For my part, I managed to remain relatively calm and non-awkward throughout the weekend. I refrained from my horrible, mildly offensive Southern accent, made charming conversation, and shook hands and made eye contact at the appropriate times. And when I got on the plane Sunday night, I breathed a sigh of relief that lasted until we pulled up to the gate at Laguardia airport!
And yet Enns seems to revive a version of it in order to “solve” the (“perceived”) tension between evolutionary accounts of human origins and the biblical understanding of human origins. But note the price for eliminating this tension: rejecting the notion that the Bible has something to say about human origins. Thus Enns questions “whether the Adam story is even relevant to the modern question of human origins;” if we appreciated this irrelevance, “much of the tension between Genesis and evolution is relieved” (69).
Complementary 2 rounds at Mini Golf
I haven't felt nearly as ready for the holidays this year. It's been a tumultuous year in many ways, at least since the accident in May. Our family has been displaced from a 'home' and even still are only in a temporary rented home.
Here are a couple more pics.
Agent John Dodson blew the whistle on Fast and Furious in an interview with CBS News on Mar. 3. Dodson had been concerned about the operation since well before the Terry murder. As large numbers of guns freely crossed the border during the early part of 2010, he and other ATF agents noted with alarm the rise in violent crime south of the border. He said he told his supervisors, “The more our guys buy, the more violence we’re having down there.”
Mets fans seem to forget that he and Darryl Strawberry were both so good in 1988 that they both canceled each other’s votes out in the MVP voting that year.
Given that Texas youth prison populations have already declined by around 2/3 since the 2007 "reforms" (which, since they apparently haven't reformed much, perhaps henceforth we should just call "changes") while juvenile crime has continued to fall, perhaps now's the right time to finish the remarkable de-institutionalization of juvenile justice begun five years ago.
“I’d like to be alone for a minute please Jasper.” Her voice broke, and he longed to hold her, to tell her this wasn’t the way. But her mind was made up.
This wasn't supposed to happen. Authors don't get signed from the slush pile. Not to high caliber agents. But I did. Jenny Bent is careful with her queries, people. She doesn't want to miss anything.
Taking Leviticus 18: 22 into proper context, then, one should also look at the preceding verse 21: “And you must not allow the devoting of any of your offspring to Molech”.
Message No. 11
Jack tells him to calm down.
The Breakin’ Out team will be looking to further develop the aftercare package in the future
In 1939 Robert met Joan Elmes, who would later become his wife. They saw little of each other during the next few years because Robert was called to Army service in the Second World War, but they were married during leave, in 1942.
I sang for years and on a very very small scale I know when u wait for your name to be called for you turn to take the stage and you have an issue that makes you sound not the best it's soul killing. To know you are going to sound like a bad bad version of yourself or worse like someone else who has no voice. I never had million dollar deals breathing down my neck. I didn't have the specter of the glaring images of my 20 year self or memories of myself at the peak of my vocal ability to haunt me. She must of felt like the worst Whitney Houston imitator on the planet. IMPOSTER!!!!!!! I always felt like a bad Clinton Gandy imitator and always was waiting to be found out and exposed as an fake/imposter.
LOL the derp face in the video preview xDD
Cos I can live with rescue attempts.
Although I loved my little escapades to my granny's house, I would never stay for more than two consecutive nights. This was mainly because she wouldn't let me use her phone to ring my friends, and in the days without mobile phones and the internet, this was a big deal.
Learn the home business insurance language
Here is the link directly to my free product:
Someone from our church had stopped me on my way out the door. I was only about 5 years old and she was waiting in the car for me. My Dad had pulled the car around to the front of the church so she didn’t have to walk far (he catered to her every whim his entire life) and had gotten out for some reason. One of the ladies at church, Mrs. Anderson stopped me and told me I had the most beautiful curly hair she had ever seen. I was over the moon! I remember skipping to the car because I thought it would make my hair bounce a little bit more and I imagined Mrs. Anderson watching me and being green with envy. I’m sure that didn’t happen, but in my 5 year old psyche, it was a picture I wanted to hold onto. I piled in the car so fast, I wasn’t accustomed to such compliments and I just needed to share it. When I told my mother about the compliment I had just received I felt like I was glowing all over. My mother turned around and looked at me sitting in the back seat of our car and said, “Mrs. Anderson feels sorry for you.” She turned back around facing the front of the car and we never said a word after that, we just waited for my Dad. I remember being very quiet the whole ride home. I was studying myself, looking for that glaring problem I must have that would stir such sympathy in someone. For more than 50 years, every time somebody complimented me on my curly hair, I thought I had a knife in my head.
This picture doesn't show it, but Chad always colors really unique and cool eggs. Carter was cracking us up because he kept exclaiming things like "Daddy, your egg is so cool!"and "Daddy, your egg is so CREATIVE" !? Where did he learn that word?
They are fun cutters that you can use on most anything from pancakes to sandwiches to cheeses and meats. Cool, right?
The point Jesus is making is that showing compassion on people by meeting their needs is a higher law than religious ritualism. This is consistent with the way Jesus sums up the law into two interrelated elements: Love God and others.
I know I’m making horrible decisions— potentially deadly choices— but the bigger part of me believes this is what’s best for me. I feel like if my body doesn’t portray what the media is encouraging it to, I will fail. I will disappoint myself and more importantly, the monster I’ve allowed to move in. It’s an unhealthy state of mind, I know, but makes me stronger in the long run. If I can just prove the statistics wrong, show that I’m not one, I’ve reached success.
Warning: Sexist and NOT SAFE for work. (My wife thought it was hilarious, though.)
I want to be a submissive. Someone that the woman takes total control over and has her way with me... I want her to take me in the ass with a strap on. I want to be commanded to do things and abused.
I have a host of other tattoos, ranging from a fairy-tale themed 3/4 sleeve, to a classy t-rex wearing a monocle and sipping a glass of wine. My calves are a Valerie Vargas inspired design, and I have a traditional style flower on my foot which I got during a visit to LA (which happens to be one of the few tattoos not done by Alastair). I've recently started collecting tattoos on my fingers, which are lovingly referred to as 'finger trinkets'.
You would say “It was all my fault”
“Me?”
*A faux flower (you can find them at craft stores or WalMart)
Sitting across from Nikki Sixx backstage at Boutwell Auditorium in Birmingham, Alabama, I started making up the song Darling Nikki.
Too high, but always beloved
My Answer: Most definitely, it would be the master bedroom. It’s next on my list. I plan to strip the wallpaper below the chair rail in that room, and paint. The paint on the walls now is the same dark teal-colored paint that was on the walls when we bought the house 21 years ago. I’m more than ready for a change and ready to lighten it up in there a bit! I hope to get new flooring too– either lay some hardwood flooring or get new carpet. Haven’t decided. Shhh…. don’t tell hubby! Last but not least, I bought a new Chaps bed comforter and will replace the old brass lamp on the nightstand.
You rock!!
So this year, we talked. We agreed that boys' desire and drive for movement is not a bad thing, and that part of our job, as parents, is helping them find outlets for their energy. Our room was a testament to our beliefs: As I led the discussion, my 5-yr-old son practiced handstands at the side of the room with another boy. No one minded. We understood that the boys need to move, that they relate and build relationships through physical interactions.
Clean up the house for the suitor of mine.
Pin a piece of velvet ribbon in the center of the double ruffle.
in my life winter walked in and it has been long but the winter stays.
Hail to the Presiding God of Pharaoh’s Dreams–Rejoice! You are praised!
Going on this treasure hunt is going to be harder than previous ones. There are now two more stops to make. And one involves a treacherous sojourn to 65GRAND, nothing more than a purveyor of over-priced buckets of painty slop. But if you want to win that Deb Sokolow piece, courtesy 40000, you will have to venture on in. That was a joke. It is only one bucket, and it is charming.
¡HOLA TEQUILA! By Colleen Graham. Sellers Publishing. 128 pages, 75 color photographs by Shannon Graham. $15.95.
Check out the video by clicking the image below:
Its been a while since I played holi. I lost interest in it after someone poured a can of emulsion paint on my head and I had to wash it with kerosene. It was pathetic and burned my skin for days but the memory of the lovely times celebrated together still fill me with nostalgia .
Camera √
Jman
Now moving on to threading part, it’s very important that you call gtk.main with a thread. And it has to be called only once during the program, otherwise there would be many threading problems. gtk.main has to be called after you have created widgets, added properties and shown.
things feel exciting but unsettled right now and i'm not so good at unsettled. i get what my sister and i refer to as 'the pit'. the pit is that feeling in your stomach when something just isn't right.
I was relaxing the other night, reading through my most recent copy of Newsweek. As I tore out a page about a book that I would like to read and flipped it over onto a pile of other such clippings, a dotted circle caught my eye.
who I am sure is a lovely, well intentioned person, but I couldn’t help thinking “Great, yet ANOTHER indictment once again on my many failures as a mother.” Love to hear what Helen thinks is the right way to handle kids, feelings of not getting it right!
Of course we had all hugged inside after we had made our plans for the next day...
I've had a hankerin' for mac and cheez, so I put some together using *gasp* store bought semolina pasta (since I don't know how to make my own mac yet) using the recipe from The New Farm Vegetarian Cookbook. I love it because it's baked and the cheez gets chewy on top.
She, spiritually, into my room
When she went to her regular appointment on July 5 at Vanderbilt, they decided to put her into the hospital for a few days for tests. The tests included various CT scans, an MRI of her brain, and visits with the ear, nose, and throat doctors who used a scope to examine her nasal passages and throat. They found no structural problems. A spinal tap was also performed. The last visit was with a speech pathologist, who suggested that there were issues in the soft palate and her epiglottis was probably not opening and closing properly. No further diagnosis was made at this point. However, she seemed to improve slightly over the 3 or 4 days she was in the hospital. So she was released while the doctors pondered the test results. About the only thing they had to say at this point was to voice the opinion that this new set of problems probably was (surprisingly) unrelated to her bone marrow problems.
That is not all, for the first time ever, an androgynous has been brought to the show and from what it seems, AzMarie Livingston has what it takes to become the top runner in the competition till her journey was cut short as she was eliminated in episode 6. AzMarie became an instant hit with the viewers not to mention the judges due to her extraordinary looks. But her refusal to wear a butt pad cost her journey in becoming America’s Next Top Model. It was said on the show that AzMarie was ‘too cool for school’ but it seems that it was just a polite to put it. All there was to it is that, AzMarie was merely standing up to her rights as an androgynous but Tyra took it as a ‘slap in the face’.
I hope you will like what you see in the coming weeks!
Hope2Africa trains African Christian youth in the Creative Arts in order that they might share the Hope of Jesus with their own communities. We use weekly meetings, one-week day-camps and weekend workshops to train. Hope2Africa members are recommended by their church and school leaders based upon their desire to train in the arts and the personal character they demonstrate.
email addresses look like this: artoridiocy@yahoo.com
Holy time of God
This is how I view the Together Grant series: different generations that have to sit down together and listen to what each other has to say and also needing the courage to share their opinions with one another.
On went the Lark in the green
Jenny Lawson realized that the most mortifying moments of our lives—the ones we’d like to pretend never happened—are in fact the ones that define us. In Let’s Pretend This Never Happened, Lawson takes readers on a hilarious journey recalling her bizarre upbringing in rural Texas, her devastatingly awkward high school years, and her relationship with her long-suffering husband, Victor. Chapters include: “Stanley the Magical, Talking Squirrel”; “A Series of Angry Post-It Notes to My Husband”; “My Vagina Is Fine. Thanks for Asking”; “And Then I Snuck a Dead Cuban Alligator on an Airplane.” Pictures with captions (no one would believe these things without proof) accompany the text.
That royal appellation is a much nicer title than this treasonous, duplicitous, hubristic, and deeply biased yellow rag deserves for its ongoing treachery.
China Glaze Cling On is a really cool olive green with a little bit of gold shimmer. I love the contrast the magnet creates with the greens. This is my favorite of the collection. It went on thinly and needed a second coat. I accidentally put the stars off center and ended up liking it better that way. It looked a lot better in person, I promise. If you don't like how a design turns out, wait for it to dry, put on another coat and try again. If it gets too thick, just take it off and start over. Cling On is a must have in my opinion!
not going cold turkey and like Coffee drinks you can do
“We have prepared necessary measures. If the dust particles reach a critical level, we will ask the Agriculture Ministry to make artificial rain,” Panadda said.
Hello All:
I cannot deny or confirm that what happened next may or may not have involved quickly ducking into a VIP party to meet him. Needless to say, I left having made the introduction and sent him a query within a couple of weeks…on my 40th birthday, figuring that turning the big 4-OMG had to have a silver lining. This is a prime example of why you should ALWAYS make a wish on your birthday, by the way!
½ cup Feta cheese, crumbled
Thanks you for your visit ladies, have a nice Sunday and see you next time!
He tapped a few buttons and started mumbling to himself, indicating to the nurse who was being connected at what time. They went to each one as he called them out checking vitals and reporting back.
The best thing to do is create your idea and put it out there as much as possible. Blast it through all your social media networks, tell people about it on Facebook, put a TM on it too, but make sure you get credit in as big and wide a forum as possible.
Oh, tears of loneliness
“Because the 2 lb. is almost two dollars less than the 5 lb. I was trying to save money.”
But then I feel good about it. Like running a marathon. That must feel horrible. But we know it feels great because of the accomplishment. And the endorphins.
Wednesday, more chiro. Need to fix up the old back so I can continue to abuse it playing tennis. Speaking of which, tennis practice Wednesday night. No rain! Woohoo!
Because of this scene and many others where she grew up hearing about appearance and size and clothing and make-up, my mom was hard on me about how I looked. It was a constant point of conflict. More so, it was a constant place of hurt.
EXTRA SERVICES PACKAGE Children under 7 years have free accommodation and breakfast. For children 8-15 years pay 50% of the package.
(it just occurred to me that i’ve been having quite a string of good days.)
Mr. Schoenfeld said the new report would increase anger against the paper. “They really are testing the limits of congressional and executive branch patience. There’s a lot of displeasure with what they’re doing,” said Mr. Schoenfeld, who edits Commentary magazine and writes a weekly column on chess for the Sun.
Does your son or daughter talk about when they used to be a grown up, life on other planets or their “other family”? These could be past life stories that are important to remember. Listen intently without saying much other than to support the story. Our memories can be jaded by experience and time. If you can record or write down these stories for them to have this may be very helpful for them in the future.
ATTORNEY: ALL your responses MUST be oral, OK? What school did you go to?
Hmmmmm, what to do......again, look up! The amazing door frame has a center decoration, therefore "let's mirror that with a center decoration on the path". At least that is what I imagine these ingenious owners said to themselves. Neutral toned bluestone and pea gravel path perfectly compliment the structure
The above canister is a
Gene proclaimed us Spartans again, and then proceeded to run me into the ground.
He kept giving the pig treats, while the cameras were rolling, even though the cameraman was asking him to use a different method of coaching her. They needed a shot where the pig was not eating. This cameraman could pass any test of manliness put in front of him, yet his requests also went unacknowledged. The brusque trainer kept giving the pig treats. Take after take. The pig chomped away, then shook off her wig.
the problems still exist
But there's a ray of hope for Doctor Al-Zayyat. She's bravely picked herself up from this setback and trotted along to a tribunal. If she wins, she could get her job back and claim 65,000 compensation for this terrible insult to her abilities. Best of luck, Sabah!
I can't believe I picked up the wrong bag at the airport. My dad is never going to let me hear the end of it.
-Do recognize that I have suffered a death in my family - not a medical condition.
One theme that is highly present throughout novels 9, 10, and 11 is parallels. While we had previously been shown a different alien, time traveler, and esper, there was no comparison for Haruhi until Sasaki came along. Their personalities are quite different, but their outward appearance is remarkably similar. Each differs from society’s norms, each is highly intelligent, and each attracts a lot of male attention, but they are truly different people once you get to know them better. Haruhi thrives on being rash and outwardly challenging; Sasaki logically evaluates the benefits of each outcome before pursuing one. One of my favorite lines to translate from novel 11 was “What would happen if Haruhi and Sasaki seriously joined forces?” because the two of them unified for a goal would guarantee a desired outcome.
Tap Takeovers are a terrific idea. They are a great way of getting a bigger, more complete picture of a brewery's abilities and talents rather than just seeing one beer every once. I've done not too badly this year with tap takeovers. The Stone night at BrewDog, Glasgow and the Harviestoun event at Hengler's Circus were both great evenings with some lovely beers on show. The Tempest Tap takeover continued in a similar vein.
The reason their unctuousness sickened me was because it brought me into their world a bit more. It made me realize how my tiny act of empathy, it wasn’t even brave, I knew that I had more social-capital than that boy by leagues. It made me realize that my tiny intersection with the shit they faced was in fact so tiny. That what they were dealing with was so much more intense than I wanted to believe could happen in the world. But it does every day. It pained me.
The talent showcase will take place on Saturday, April 28 in the afternoon and evening. This is optional, and does not affect the total pageant score. The pageant check-in, orientation, competition and final show will all take place on Sunday, April 29.
Amazon
* Whenever he sees a park he says "Play slide!"
problems, or failure at school. Once you have God’s Word in that area, you have
My friend and I went to a Slayer gig recently and we looked like a couple of dads come to pick up their kids from the concert. I bought a Slayer t-shirt from a tout outside but I only wear it when I'm painting the house, I don't want to be one of those blokes desperately trying to hold onto their youth.
www.refrigeratorartist.com
How does a 22 month old prance?
The marble turned a brighter red, and it dropped an inch signifying resigned failure. “There is no reference. There is only you.”
That's all the news from the castle for this weekend, a very low-key affair for which I am very grateful.
RIKEN
2:00 Leave campus and run all errands (feed, grocery store, post office, and so forth)
"Do you think you would do this again next year?"
You’ve been in a number of different films and TV projects – which actors/actresses have been your favourites to work with so far and why?
2010.08.08 Indonesia Bekasi 0 12 A mob of hundreds of Muslims chase and beat Christian worshippers after disrupting their service.
Very good audience recording, worth the download, - BackyardT
Pumpkin Seeds, sparingly
My personal opinion is that a platonic relationship ought not to be partaken of for religious reasons. The religious motivation to save sex for marriage still highlights the eventual goal of sex. Marriage is, on earth (unlike in heaven), a legally binding agreement to remain exclusively coupled with a partner until either death or divorce, and ought to be treated rationally: your wife or husband is your business partner for life, so you ought to want to keep the business running for a while. The chimera of sex and business does not a happy couple make. Happiness results from a shared vision, a manifesto of intent agreed upon by both parties.
Remember, you can’t save something by destroying it. Which isn’t to say that swashbuckling entrepreneurs aren’t willing to try. All they need is the liberating impetus of that essential American ethic: “I’m getting mine, screw you.” But the cost of this plunder will be incalculable, for it will ripple through the economy for decades. And the damage will be irreversible for, while public education is the most powerful democratizing institution in the world, it only works when the schools work. When they cease to work, it’s over.
I have to give props to TaDa Creative Studios for amazing papers from their Frozen Tozen line that made this layout POP! The colors of this collection are sublime and so great to work with. In case you are just as in love with the papers as I am, here is what I used in my layout:
"When the Episcopal Church can embrace heresy and counsel lawsuits it is hypocritical to say Global South primates should not intervene to save orthodox parishes and dioceses. If it is all right for Primates to intervene in Africa with money why is it not right for African Primates to intervene in the US?"
Once you have your project photographed and uploaded to your blog or on-line gallery, please link the URL to your entry on this post using Inklinkz. If you use an on-line gallery, please be sure to use CR84FN4 as the keyword and if you have a blog, please display the graphic so I can easily find your entry. I hope you come join along and Create For Fun!
I shouldn't have done it, but I have a fabric addiction.
My first son was born ten days 'late' on December 19th 2008. By my estimations I reckoned he was due around the 16th, but being a first-time Mum and not appreciating how much importance was placed on that date, I never argued with the midwives when they selected the date based on the 12 week ultrasound. It was only when we reached that date that I realised what a mistake that had been.
Next, I prepared all the components I would need to assemble my tiramisu cake - I made espresso extract, espresso kahlua syrup (which uses the espresso extract), and freshly whipped cream to lighten a mascarpone filling (which also uses the espresso extract, as well as a bit of kahlua for extra flavor). Once all of the components were ready, I placed my prepared cake board inside the Hello Kitty mold, followed by the first layer of cake.
sidebar in ....yes I have known about the assignment long enough so that I wouldn't be jammed up...but we procrastinate the stuff we are most fearful or uncomfortable doing...I am ain't right ...just honest...sidebar out
Mozzarella cheese (organic): On sale for $3.49/8 oz, used 1/2 = $1.75
1/3 oz - Columbus (30 min)
But, of course, the Tories are not proposing a review of these Pension Funds, and the fact that workers in both the Public and private Sectors are being royally screwed, both by the exorbitant charges they make, and by the appalling lack of performance that those being paid such large sums have demonstrated. When Bernie Madoff did something similar with the money of the really rich, he was soon brought to book, and put behind bars, but the Finance Houses are free to rip off ordinary workers at will, and the Tories whose friends they are, are not going to lift a finger to stop them. Instead, they will ask workers once again to pick up the tab.
Jen says: After Suede and Blur, they’re probably my favourite band. Crazy For You was virtually perfect; languid, summery and incessantly catchy. I also love the new single, which progresses their old sound without losing any of the warmth or charm. They’re contemporary canon for any self-respecting surf-pop/alt-pop fan.
genuine lack of participation is genuine naivity
Yesterday the 2011 Bike blessing had 91 registered riders and it was a HUGE success.
Chateau Marmont, today a Los Angeles historical/cultural landmark, began life in 1929 as an upscale apartment building. It's fortunes fell with the stock market a few months later and in 1931 the building was sold and turned into a suites hotel. The new owner was Albert E. Smith, co-founder of American Vitagraph (purchased by Warner Bros. in 1925). Smith and his wife furnished the Chateau with pieces found at local estate sales and auctions, giving the hotel what is known as "the Marmont look." Over the years, the Chateau developed a reputation for its discretion in providing guests with maximum privacy. In 1939, Columbia Pictures president Harry Cohn famously advised rising stars William Holden and Glenn Ford, "If you must get in trouble, do it at Chateau Marmont." The Chateau's long history is filled with rumors and legends, among them: Clark Gable and Jean Harlow rendezvoused there, F. Scott Fitzgerald lived and wrote there, Vivien Leigh was a guest following her split with Laurence Olivier and covered the walls of her suite with pictures of him, script readings for Rebel Without a Cause were held in one of the hotel bungalows, Paul Newman and Joanne Woodward met there...and on and on.
The Polish Catholic Church, at least the hierarchy, is in no hurry to discuss things with Isakowicz Zaleski and take his revelations into account (thus fuelling the scepticism of the press which wants names). The only voice raised on the subject is that of Fr. Józef Augustyn, a Jesuit who for years has been willing and able to publicly discuss some of the most burning questions regarding the sexual conduct of the laity and the clergy.
a Sabbath afternoon, beside
the local Cajun population, that ultimately gets the entire squad into deep, deep, deep shit! Lost in unfamiliar territory and hunted by the people who make the bayou their home, the soldiers strive to find their way out in one piece with only a few rounds of live ammunition. If their Cajun pursuers don't kill them, they just might kill each other.......Welcome to the Louisiana National Guard! The locals go to great lengths to torment the hapless soldiers, laying booby traps marked with an equal number of animal skins...seven soldiers, seven dead rabbits, and seven bear traps...Southern Comfort buys into the whole Backwoods Brutality genre created in the 1970s by films like The Texas Chain Saw Massacre (1974), The Hills Have Eyes (1977) and in particular Deliverance (1972). These films tended to portray a huge difference between unassuming city folk and the people living in backwoods America, and to huge effect...when you think of hillbilly folk you think of horror movies right? I think Walter sees Southern Comfort as his protest against the Vietnam war, which is around the time when the movie is set...out-of-their depth US servicemen and a native enemy who justify their extreme behaviour on the grounds they're protecting what's theirs, you don't have to look too hard to see that the film has a lot to say about Vietnam.
- Netflix!
Make Way for Tomorrow (US…Leo McCarey)
Caption America is Brad’s blog and that’s where you should go to follow him. His blog is just hilarious. Brad takes pics of LA and his travels and captions them, plain and simple. I dare you to work your way through his blog posts without laughing. It’s impossible. I lost it repeatedly over: the 7-11 pizza boxes and the capri pants and the Captain A hat. You will too. Take some time, whittle your way through the images and the humor, and then show Brad your love. Trust me, I’m not making his day by doing this, I’m making yours.
A few carrots
* In a small bowl, cream butter and confectioners' sugar until light and fluffy. Beat in egg and extracts. Gradually add flour and salt; mix well. Divide in half; flatten and wrap each portion in plastic wrap. Refrigerate for at least 30 minutes or until easy to handle.
Your budget may also be a factor while choosing the perfect party wear combination. However, you can look for party dresses in different price ranges on the internet and choose a dress that meets your budget requirements. Another important thing is to choose the right kind of accessories to make a party dress work for you. The accessories like jewelry, handbag and shoes must complement the party dress you choose so that you have an overall noticeable look.
Humans learn and grow by making mistakes. We grow when we make poor choices, apologize, learn to make better judgment calls, and make a better choice next time. My father is fond of repeating another old saying, “The person who never made a mistake never learned anything.” I want to spend my time with people who make mistakes! People who forgive me when I make mistakes. People who can assess a situation and know when good enough is simply enough, when done enough is really enough. People who spend their time caring about me and my family and their communities, instead of who spend their time fussing and fretting and trying to achieve the impossible perfection.
The problem is…I think that the only people who would believe his writing are those that already support his ideas. He is ‘preaching to the choir’ as they say. The point of any good philosophical book or essay should be to make those of the opposing view actually question their views…not laugh at you…or feel the need to throw up or take a shower after reading it.
There were a few areas of my life that needed to be infused with it.
the music won't last.
1. More Than You Know
In David we find the faith of a child. The kind of faith our Lord Jesus speaks of,
but in hers, a gem
Belgium has brought the world many beer styles. Hefty abbey ales, dubbels and triples, fruity lambics, and sour geueze usually grab most of the attention. But Wit or white beer is the delicate flower of the Belgian beer scene that fits perfectly when the weather starts to turn warm.
“I’m sure if we put everything into this game, with the quality we’ve got it can make the difference.”
a time to keep and a time to throw away,
Customer Support
What’s surprising about the latest release? Apartment prices nationally were down 4.3% in the month of January 2012. Prices inDublin took a battering again, with house prices down 4.1% in the month and apartment prices down 3.5%. Price drops outsideDublin continue to be more modest, with non-Dublin houses down by just 42.7% compared withDublin houses of 55.4%.
Something needs to be worked out of you. Thirty is a watershed. You should be happy but aren’t. You need to clear your head.
Who is coming closest to presenting the TRUTH about Trayvon Martin and George Zimmerman?
Spoon batter into prepared pan; sharply tap the pan once on counter to remove air bubbles. Bake at 350° for 45 minutes or until a wooden pick inserted in the center comes out clean. Cool in pan 10 minutes on a wire rack; remove from pan. Cool completely on a wire rack. Sift powdered sugar over top of cake. Cut cake into 16 slices.
Galore was published in Canada in 2009. A national bestseller, it was the winner of the Commonwealth Writers’ Prize for Best Book (Canada & Caribbean), the Canadian Authors’ Association Fiction Prize and was shortlisted for the Governor-General’s Award for fiction.
“Stupid question, but how is it that it can land without killing everyone…?”
A Year with God is a book that can be used as a daily devotional or as a devotional as needed. Even if one doesn't pick up the Bible daily, I highly suggest reading one devotional a day from this well written book.
In a country of 1 billion voices, there is room for 1 billion opinions. But no one can deny that Savarkar was a brave freedom fighter who loved India from the hills to the seas, including the islands on which he was imprisoned. And as I saw the statues of the heroes in Veer Savarkar Park, I realised that it is not the 1 billion opinions which count. It is a few hundred or thousand good men and women with courage, intelligence and a love for the country. They carry the rest of us, opinions and all…!
Now that I think about it, the college talk was not unlike the sex talk. (I guess the key difference between the college talk and the sex talk that I had with my mother is that we never actually had a sex talk, except for that fateful evening when she told me to “cover myself in latex” in the event of “sexual contact”). In that heart-felt one-sided diatribe shared between a mother and her daughter, I learned the facts of life. College was the vehicle by which civilization as we knew it persevered.
But this is where Laporte goes in for the ‘kill’: he adds ““It was, above all, the anti-capitalism of left-of-centre British trade unionists which made them believe that East European Communism was on the right path.... But the British Left ignored massive human rights abuses and the lack of basic freedoms behind the Iron Curtain because they believed that the basic development in the direction of Socialism was right.” As if he thinks that once and for all he has stumped all advocates of communism and won the argument! How wrong can one man be? Well, apparently quite a lot. He is quite right in his assertion that anti-capitalists in Britain saw those who had over-thrown capitalism as ‘along the right track’. Yet he returns to his anti-historical perspective almost immediately when he adds that the British Left ignored massive human rights abuses – a statement which flies in the face of reality.
BYOB - bring your own braces
I’d have to say Edgar Allan Poe overall but Oscar Wilde as well. The Picture of Dorian Gray is probably one of the most brilliant stories I’ve ever known and it piqued my interest when it came to the development of suspense.
Being mad can mean many states, did you know that? The actual definition of the word here can mean anything from being insane to actually being crazy about something; very excited, if you will.
#67 - Arielle Martin Verhaaren, bronze parallel
Brussels own De la Senne, as well as Jandrain-Jandrenouille,
Using an immersion blender, I pureed the soup until there were no lumps left, adjusted the seasoning, then I stirred in some heavy cream
Last Saturday, our very good friend (who also apparently knows everyone else in Louisiana), evil genius, party animal and well-connected impresario, Todd Mouton put together one of the finest soirées I have ever attended. Dubbed the Saint Street Carnival: Revelry de Rio (Todd always comes up with the most ingenious names) the happening was on the night of the Lafayette’s Krewe de Rio Parade- always held on the Saturday that falls a week prior to Mardi Gras proper. Held at the Saint Street Inn – there was a fantastic menu of Brazilian Barbeque and a way cool Tikki Bar out front, and the last three cases in Lafayette of our Courir de Mardi Gras beer, plus our Mello Dubbel coffee beer on tap inside. Valcour Records provided the live music. Before the Parade the Pine Leaf Boys Trio played some addictively foot-stomping traditional Cajun music. After the Parade Corey Lil Pop Ledet Zydecoed the night away, protected from the bitter wind by strategically placed sheets of visqueen, which decorated the front porch of the restaurant until the food and beer were gone. Saint Street Inn was packed until closing time – even though the temperature dipped down to near 28 degrees. Oh yea, the Krewe of Rio Parade was fantastic – the marching bands were awesome.
30. Many people mistakenly believe that the singer Ruby Murray is Scottish. In fact, she's an Indian.
Sebastian: wow! That's not one I hear every day ;)
…the performance ended, the children bedded,
You may also choose to make a Love-A-Sister donation to help pay for a portion of one woman’s surgery.
Not too shabby after all!
Some days you wake up and think about all the good you’ve done with the blood-donating and the volunteering and the parent-finding for orphan puppies. And then you’re like, whoa. It’s been almost a month since I’ve authored a post on my world-renown blog. I guess what I’m saying is, sorry to keep you waiting, Mom. Here, without further ado, is one of my latest projects.*
I also had Coffee Break make up the skull stencill in a larger size. Very few people know that any of their stencils can be made in a larger size. And since the anatomical skull is my favorite, I wanted it bigger! It looks even more amazing in the larger size:
Then shall there come unto man the great warfare
Without another word, Nik plugged the disk into a slot on his left gauntlet control pad and a small screen in the bottom left of his HUD winked into existence. The video recording that followed showed something he never would have believed had it come from someone’s mouth. From the time the door blew open to the time the man with the mask walked out of the room was shorter than he would have believed possible. And the power displayed was simply incredible.
He's a constant disappointment, constantly breaks promises, and constantly lies about things I already know about.
Confronted for the first time with this proposal for free distribution according to need, many people are sceptical. What about the lazy man? Or the greedy man? Who will do the dirty work? What will be the incentive to work? These are objections socialists hear time and time again. These are perhaps understandable reactions to what seems, to those who have never thought about it, a startling proposition. As a matter of fact, behind these objections, is a carefully cultivated popular prejudice as to what human nature is. This is dealt in the section "Is human nature a barrier to Socialism?" Suffice it to say here the biological and social science and anthropological research conclusively show that so-called human nature is not a barrier to the establishment of Socialism.
In the final chapter of Before Philosophy, Frankfort identifies two historic exits from the “I-Thou” perspective: the monotheistic Jewish exit, where deity is conceived as starkly transcendent and the material world is God’s handiwork but never God’s self; and the Greek exit, where the personification of phenomena breaks down among the pre-Socratics and a proto-scientific perspective becomes possible for the first time. In the mingling of these two, Frankfort says, you have the germinal confluence of western culture’s past 2,500 years. Of course, it’s not really that simple. I wonder sometimes if Christian sacramentalism, for example, marks a counter-current. By insisting on God’s at least potential immanence in material objects (the Eucharist especially, but not merely) it does something, perhaps, to repopulate the non-human world. It never delivers one back to the full enchantments of pantheism, I suppose, but it may feed the same appetite by offering something approaching panentheism.
‘When you’re in town?’ But the snowman’s right there. He is in town.
What the hammer? what the chain?
Thank you, LSU. We needed this.
And I’ve changed too. I have family members who refuse to set foot in Germany. One won’t even change planes in Frankfort Airport. I completely understand this. But as a post-war baby, I’ve had the luxury of developing hopefulness and idealism. And I’ve decided that I don’t want the Nazis to have the last word.
2. Learning About Family Or Origin Issues
Palm capital. An ancient Egyptian type, resembling the crown of a palm tree.
Could tell from the start that the shin was off, so after heading up Amphi for about a minute I turned around and walked home.
you know because your a preacher and all!
New challenges I want to tackle: making lampwork glass beads, making stuff out of precious metal clay (which, like alchemy, changes from clay to solid metal in the kiln), how to speak Spanish… I’m not going to live long enough to learn all the stuff I’d like to know about! How about you? What challenge are you eying? What’s keeping you back? Go for it – life is brief, don’t waste it!
It all started with sort of a selfish aim. Beryl Katz had a young son with intense ADHD, and he needed special attention in school. Yet the programs that kids like Mike needed were expensive, and seniors in the Council Rock, Pennsylvania district often showed up to oppose funding them. Beryl understood the seniors’ position, because her parents were living on fixed incomes, but she’d also been a teacher, so she knew the other side as well.
Thank you thank you thank you to those who have purchased one or more of my assorted novelty items. It never ceases to amaze and delight me that there are people in the world who would voluntarily shell out their hard-earned cash just to wear one of my drawings on their chests.
9 Trust Your Old Friend 3:54
#96...Leah Ann Gast
What is noticeable instantly when you look at the figures is that Debden Wards ( with BNP representation) have a lower crime rate than the Loughton wards (without BNP representation)
Afterward, I asked Brodsky if using eminent domain for MSG was a new idea or if had it come up before.
Qais Azimy, Al Jazeera’s correspondent in Kabul, said that Afghan officials have confirmed that Bin Laden had died and that his body was with the United States.
Cut while warm. (This is something I forgot to do and was harder to cut.)
While I don’t necessarily think it is more expensive to be Vegan, I do believe it can be expensive to be a social Vegan. There are so many special events like Vegan chef appearances at restaurants and charity galas that I wish I could go to, but unfortunately, many are too expensive for me. I have to admit I sometimes feel it is unfair that I can donate my time and energy to a cause or raise money for a cause but then can’t attend a dinner or party for that same cause because I can’t afford the ticket. I wish restaurants and organizations would take into consideration that not all Vegans have a lot of money. At this point, I can attend most events only if they are free or if I can volunteer or bring a dish. I know I’m missing out on a lot of great experiences with a lot of amazing people and I wish I could afford more but that’s not my reality at this time.
Melanie Fazi - Elegy **: After a woman's children disappear, she becomes convinced they've been eaten by a demonic tree. Yeah. This is one of those horror stories told in a stream of consciousness style that hints at the delusional mind of the narrator. It's told well enough, but ultimately she's rehashing Poe and Maupassant.
1 ruby red grapefruit
I'd started further up than usual hoping that would decrease the dodging. It didn't. I still struggled to find an nice, clear spot where I wasn't constantly on people's heels. The urge to pass anyone and everyone was strong. "Run your own race," I repeated over and over again. It will clear out. Don't wear yourself out.
Here is another example of mixing warms and cools to make the accents really pop!
While wandering around the reception, a Chinese woman who barely spoke any English and had two small children came up to me and gestured to a camera. I thought she wanted me to take a picture, but soon realized that she wanted her four-year-old son to take a picture of her with me. The lady obviously thought I was more important than I really was. Her son could barely work the camera, taking a couple of pictures of the ceiling, so I suggested that someone get a picture of all of us.
You can call it TMNT grilled cheese (especially if you want to post about it on your geek-themed blog), or you can just call it yummy.
Shana truly surprised me when I first watched it last year. It had a very depressing opening with Hikari fading from everyone’s mind, but moved into a pretty good story. The first season was better than average while the second season had parts that I couldn’t stand. The OVAs were nice side stories, but nothing important overall. But when Final started, it was another tempo. The addition of Yuji to the Tomogara, and with their leader as well, was a fantastic bait-and-switch. As the series came to an end (and I’m sure it’ll be viewed more favorably by those who marathon it), the tie-in and tie-up of the loose cords was very well executed. As it should be, the final episode truly captured the “final” aspect of the series. I enjoyed it immensely.
I wonder what the FIA would have done if I wanted to sketch a Picasso sketch? Drawing and painting of art is a long tradition among artists. Of course the copied paintings may be in the public domain. Why not photos? Also, I don't want to get into a political screed on the problems with copyright laws in the US and how they are designed to prop up corporations like Disney. That's a topic for a different post. Here is a little information on derivative works of art and copyright. I suspect that if I wanted to post a picture of my boys in the museum with art in the background it would be okay. Of course I would have to obtain permission. I hate asking for permission. So all you get is a picture of my sticker.
I've told this story to several of my friends, and most of them laughed, but two or three were genuinely offended. Instead of hearing a cute story about how my three year old mistook Frankenstein for a politician, they heard this:
Go back to 1990, when the National League for Democracy overwhelmingly won elections in Burma: It got 59% of vote and won 81% of the seats in Parliament. But the military blocked Parliament from convening because, simply, it didn't like who won. That lead to a continuation of the years of brutal military dictatorship.
Allow a thumbnail’s width between the shoe and your big toe.
Slowly his eyes closed. A sharp pain slashed his chest.
In all affairs at the moment we seem to have a government that is incapable of independent thought, let alone independent action. In addition to the EU we slavishly follow what our allies do, whether formally through NATO or the United Nations, or by grovellingly kowtowing to the United States. Don't get me wrong, I'm not a USA basher by any stretch of the imagination, they are fine allies to have and valuable friends. What I find demeaning as a British citizen is the way Blair/Brown/Cameron have slavishly followed the lead of Bush/Obama. As the Americans look set to jettison the vacuous Obama Cameron was over there grovelling and smarming around him while ignoring conservatives in the Republican Party. Cameron is a visionless 'yes man' who should be dumped by his party at the first opportunity.
Workbox/File 3:Apologia Science book, read pages 25-32, 25 minutes
As you breathe-out, envision Ryan looking vibrant and well
I look back on Lost Boys 2 and think that we were fucking insane to even attempt to make that movie in 21 days.
What I think I'm keenest on, is how this book covers so many branches of interest. Not just the sex, but also the federal suspense, the science of youth, the medical world, the secrets. Accolades to Kahn for his ability to somehow weave all of this together.
"Hell, I loved life GF, loved it man. Loved the show...and that's all that it is my friend, a show. Love and life are strange my friend, you've said it yourself".
Almost all of the Pythons checked out of the Gleneagles rather quickly, in favour the Imperial Hotel down the road. But John Cleese stayed on for weeks, and even invited his then wife Connie Booth to join him and marvel at their host.... and comedy gold was born!
To enter this giveaway, just leave a comment over on Andrea's post by Friday the 10th of February (11:59pm EST) about the number one reason you love to sew. The giveaway is open internationally and Andrea will choose a winner randomly and announce the results on Saturday the 11th! YAY! Fabulous giveaway!!
I wanted to list just one bracelet today, but I just could not get a good picture. Has that ever happened to you? That is when you just have to walk away and come back later and try again. And that is what I did.
Written by David Whitaker
While Republicans have been the main focus of my ire during almost the whole Obama administration, I have to say that I received something yesterday that really angered me.
Any girl who’s plagued by oily skin will tell you that a good and cheap mattifying powder is worth it’s weight in gold.. Thankfully this Maybelline Dream Matte Powder is still pretty affordable.. lol..
William F. Fallon, 53, Rocky Hill, N.J.
2. We want to be in a position to adopt the children placed with us should that become an option. Having already lost their first family, losing another and having to adjust a second time is just too much. Sibling order plays a big part in how you identify yourself. For children who have gone through so much I feel like it is important when possible for them to keep that bit of themselves. So if we adopt a sibling set, the oldest would still be the oldest, and the second child will always be the second child, etc. They would only have to adjust to any younger siblings coming in, maintaining their natural birth order. I am not trying to say that you shouldn’t adopt or foster children if you have children already, this is just one of our considerations.
Preheat oven to 450°F.
Well, that was news to me. Apparantly I am not happy. Just a couple of weeks ago, we were on our way home from a birthday party. Trevin looked at me in the front seat and said (in an endearing tone) "Mommy, you are bery cute, not bery fart." I took it as a compliment at the time.
So I have saved my ARC copy of Alice in Zombieland (click for my review) for today's giveaway. (SEE...PERFECT GIVEAWAY!) I've had it for probably about 8 months...just waiting and waiting. Read once, of course, but the book is in EXCELLENT condition, and if you like the mash-up novels, or zombies, or well...anything that is even a tiny bit trippy...you'll like this one!! Sadly, due to shipping costs, etc, this particular giveaway is for US only. But I have another for everyone!
This is a book that with poems explains how some animals eat and what they eat. Each poem will talk about a different animal. Finally a more narrative and brief description is given on each animal at the end of the book.
The marsh grass could stay in a couple of swales, perhaps even deepened to give a place for the water. Some bog plants like Darmera peltata and perhaps some skunk cabbage (known poetically in the UK as swamp lanterns) could be added.
You don’t have to accept any of the offers to enter the competition!
D.H: Yup. How about all the football players singing “Did I ever tell you you're my Hero” to common folk...good commercial?
The Constitution says “Congress shall have the power to coin money,” and that is all it says about who has the power to create money. It does not say Congress can delegate to private banks the right to create 97% of the national money supply in the form of loans...
With this in mind...
Probably Good Ones I Missed And/Or Will Be Seeing Soon: Precious, Bad Lieutenant: Port of Call New Orleans, Drag Me to Hell, Moon, World’s Greatest Dad, Ponyo, Gentlemen Broncos, The Princess and the Frog, Cloudy With a Chance of Meatballs, Big Fan, An Education, Religulous
Most of us just assume life will go according to some rules. We will marry our prince charming, establish a home, fill the home with the children we desire, graduate them from college, attend their weddings, bounce grand babies on our knees while enjoying retirement. Life rarely goes according to our Garden of Eden ideas. Heaven will hold that perfect vision, not this sin-filled world.
NZPA is 6% ABV and pours straw coloured with a short-lived off-white head. On the nose the dominant aroma is lemon candy with some white wine. A swirl of the glass reveals some bitter gooseberry and grapefruit notes. On tasting the flavours are all about the hops. There is a big lemon grass presence that reminds me very much of Sorachi Ace even though that hop is not used in this ale. There is also a fair bit of grassiness to the hop flavour. In the middle we get some piney notes cut through by an acidic bite of bitter grapefruit and gooseberry. The finish is robustly bitter but not harsh, pithy and long-lived, with the bitterness of the hops remaining on the back of the tongue for well in excess of ten minutes after finishing the glass of ale. Despite the dominance of the hop flavours the ale is underpinned by a good malt backbone that lends a fairly smooth mouthfeel, medium body and a little sweetness throughout that is a well judged counterpoint to the citric and bitter qualities of the hops. There are two things that I really like about NZPA. The first being it uses four very different hop varieties but not one of the four seem to dominate with their own characteristic flavours. Secondly, the brewer has used these vibrant hop varieties in a way that crafts a set of aromas and flavours that stamp a very individual character on NZPA. I dare say if you were to blind-taste this ale with another half a dozen hoppy New World pale ales chosen at random, this one would definitely standout as something unique and quite special. With so many up and coming UK microbreweries now taking their cue from breweries overseas, the US in particular, it's fast becoming very important to craft something individual rather than conform to a formulaic approach. In that respect NZPA nails it for me. Superb and highly recommended!
In a small bowl, whisk the mayonnaise, scallions, parsley, lemon zest, salt, pepper and cayenne together until well combined. Pour this mixture over the shrimp and breadcrumbs, and use a rubber spatula to gently fold everything together.
(I am headed out of town tomorrow for my daughter's birthday and I won't be back until Saturday morning. I am not taking the computer with me, so I decided to post my mom's regular Saturday post today for everyone to enjoy. I'll see you all on Monday, Lord willing! ~ Sheri)
SAME DARN PLACE
Newspapers have also progressed with new services and report formats. Based on member feedback, ABC refreshed the newspaper Audit Report by updating labels, merging some categories and eliminating others. This spring, newspapers will release the first reports with this updated format.
Her lips begin to part. The frozen second has thawed. Leaving me suddenly too small for the space I am standing in. I turn my back on her before she can propel her words out. I face my son. He is looking down. His hair splintering forward across his face. Head bowed. Sealed off within himself. We stand in an awkward silence. His fingers begin flicking at the seams of his thighs. That endless signalling of his Morse code of distress.
I think it's only natural.
- IP5 Common Documentation
Until then,
Colonel Yates leaves with the police. Sir James, he says, will be joining them later.
You can purchse this new cookbook at my shopping website by clicking on the link in the sidebar. The retail price is $14, plus shipping and sales tax.
Donna - 24
What else am I to expect? He is a drug addict.
From our experience, going from no preparation to being prepared can be exciting, interesting, frightening, overwhelming, and exhausting – sometimes all on the same day. Many seasoned preppers talk about something called prepper fatigue or prepper’s block which is kind of like the end of the honeymoon phase. Basically, when you first get going, everything is new, interesting, exciting, and engaging. You realize there are so many things you never even thought of, so many things you don’t know, so many things to stockpile. You feel pressured to do everything right now (which consequently often increases once you start focusing energy on prepping) because the more you learn the more you realize that SHTF day could literally be any day. You drive your friends and family crazy, if you share this stage with them, because all you talk about is prepping and the worst of what the world has to offer. You can’t understand why everyone around you doesn’t see it and they can’t understand why you think buying 500 pounds of rice is more important than a giant TV. You are sprinting in a marathon and eventually, you will run out of steam.
Rejoice in the Lord always. I will say it again: Rejoice! Let your gentleness be evident to all. The Lord is near. Do not be anxious about anything, but in everything, by prayer and petition with thanksgiving present your requests to God. and the peace of God which trascends all understanding will guard your heartss and your minds in Christ. Phillipians 4:4-7
Let’s talk a bit about you Daren. What made you want to get into the industry in the first place?
And this week's prize is kindly donated by the lovely Krista Smith! of saturated canary!
Here we are again, another Wednesday, and I have a few more cards to show you. A couple were inspired by a quote I found on C. B. Wentworth‘s site. She had made another journal page using a quote by George Moore: “A man travels the world to find what he needs and finds it when he gets home.” I thought it would make a great saying for my masculine birthday cards, so she challenged me to use it. Here are the results:
“But when you saw me you did.” His comfort came in the shape of a smile. “Over the socks.”
Islamic wisdom says the conduct of the people determines their destiny, and based upon the same Allah changes their rulers.I hope and pray that Allah ease the path for a better government for the people of the great nation of Egypt.
Do you have any badges/scarf’s?
Worship: Surrendering the Body
Once upon a time called right now, I've got a 22 ounce Imperial India Pale Ale. Yeah. It's from Avery in Colorado. Very cool design, with some foil on the top. A big A. Enough of this ish talking, this is what the guy at Central Market called the most bitter beer on the shelf.
G A5
I perused a number of sites including Massage Warehouse, Massage King, Best Massage and finally, Amazon.com. Most of the tables that were listed as portable were between 25 and 35 lbs. Although way lighter than the 46 lbs. bundle I had been lugging about, this range was not what I defined as easy to carry. Nevertheless, I finally settled on a 25 lbs. table advertised on Amazon that was ridiculously cheap due to its unpopular baby pink hue. In the description, it noted the total package weight (i.e. table with packing materials in its box) to be 32 lbs. When the table arrived, I was surprised to see the only packing material was a single plastic sheath. The table weight was 32 lbs. When I contacted customer service, they told me I had “misread” the BOLDED seller description that stated “Lightweight Massage Table – just 25lbs.” I could argue till blue in the face, but in the end, there was no way to get a refund or exchange because the table was on clearance. Despite my deep frustration, I tried to make the new table work and it did…I ended up leaving it at a client’s apartment and it has essentially become her private table for our sessions. I reverted back to the 46 pounder during the Holidays for a few sessions, but felt broken by Valentine’s. I refused to believe that there weren’t any tables on the market below 25 lbs. I just hadn’t searched hard enough or opened my budget up to a bigger investment. In the long run, if I am going to have a successful practice, I kind of need my body to not fall part at the seams.
The Fredericksburg Brewing Company is my local brewpub. Yeah they only have five beers on tap, and no guest taps, but they make good beer, and it's a fun place to hang out. When I arrived the Monday after New Years Day, I was informed that there were only 800 gallons of Hoppy Holidaze left. (I'm on Untapped.com, by the way. Look for Hiikeeba.) I promised to do as much as I could to help them free up a serving tank. Unfortunately I am only one man.
Your voice matters. They say that actions speak louder than words, but words can inspire if they are based on actions. Put the two together, your actions and your words and they will add value to each other. If people are watching your actions and hearing your words, they will begin to do the things you do. This will have a multiplying effect over time. “Why bother,” because your voice matters when it is coupled with actions that are based on your involvement. If you were not born a millionaire or born into royalty; you will have to build it from the ground up. How much you get done depends on how much of a team you have around you. I used to like to watch that T.V. show where they could tear down and rebuild a house in a week. Can’t do that by yourself, you need a team; and your team needs to see that you are willing to back your words with your actions.
I've made this a few times. The lemon zest hits first and then you get the bready/yeasty Belgian type flavor to finish. It is a good summer beer as the lemon makes it refreshing. Here's the first beer I make with water conditioned with a campden tablet to rid the water of any chloramines. Kegged straight from primary.
RIP Harvey.
I’m at a quandary about posting too much more stuff on here as WordPress have disabled the tag-search system meaning that when I wrote my last blog post not even I could find it listed. This means that if I can no longer find posts on topics I’m interested in then sure as hell no-one else can find anything I write. It’s like this new community just got a lot smaller.
I'm taking it easy this week while recovering from the A-to-Z Challenge, and before launching the next steps, which you can read about here and on the official A-to-Z Challenge Blog in the coming week. So today will just be the picture of me with Jeffery Deaver at the Pikes Peak Writers Conference.
Over the last 100 years our society has been busy birthing new realities, thrusting itself forward into an unfamiliar, unknowable future. Women's suffrage and civil rights were the cusp of these changes, as our family structures, social relationships, and cultural growth has reflected an even broader transformation. Young people, who at first were merely keeping pace with those changes, went from being the canaries in the coalmine to being the leaders at the front, taking charge, making movements, and driving social change as never before. Today, young people are the bellweather of the brave new future we continue to move towards.
Now, I had thought about the consequences, but as I could barely smell it anymore, had a fan going, and (most importantly) was too lazy to move the machine, I decided I would risk it.
Unlike last year, I was unable to make the drive to Terre Haute for the NCAA Cross Country Championships. What an odd day I missed at that. Fortunately VS network carried the race live and I took a seat on my couch to take in the action. The commentating left something to be desired but beggars can't be choosers. Surprises and unexpected placings seemed to be the norm for the day. I guess there is a reason they don't mail the trophy in advance and go ahead and run the race.
She closed her styrofoam container
The Good: Despite longer wait times, there is good news. It appears the last northbound Bx1 limited-stop bus now leaves 136 St around 7:40 PM (a lengthened span – the last southbound limited bus still leaves 231 St around 6:25 PM); it also appears that overall service runs until a bit later in the night, though I’m not entirely sure.
28th - 31st January, 11am to 7pm
Stray Dog
"Me?" The rabbit closed the watch.
The combination of dazzling (formalist) experimentation, nested flashbacks, outrageous compositions (which boggle the mind as well as the eye) and a continual inter-cutting between black & white and saturated colour creates the feeling of an unreliable narrator patching together a tapestry of elaborate fabrication, and goes further than any other film (that I can think of) in capturing the atmosphere and tonality of the great short stories of the Argentine writer Jorge Luis Borges, who seems to have been an influence.
Fiona Dunbar is the author of the Lulu Baker trilogy, recently adapted for TV as the popular children’s series Jinx – and the Silk Sisters books, a futuristic adventure trilogy. She has also written a one-off children’s novel, Toonhead. A long time ago, in another lifetime, she was also an illustrator; she illustrated stories for the likes of Francesca Simon and Catherine Storr, as well as three picture books of her own.
Picking up on the poor technique of most asthmatics, I've cut and pasted the suggestions from the Oz Prescriber so that those of you with asthma, or who have children/adolescents with asthma, can review what you are/they are doing and see if you can do it better.
The Sheraton Nassau Beach sits on seven acres with one thousand feet of beach frontage, has three large pools with waterfalls and a swim-up bar (that you'll certainly visit after your shark encounter), and is 15 minutes from Lynden Pindling International Airport.
During last year's marathon I was in Brooklyn, where Fort Greene tumbles down into Clinton Hill which promptly runs into Bedford-Stuyvesant. I took note of the many people giving that supportive hand to the runners. Eventually I reached the corner of Bedford and Lafayette avenues, across from KFC in what is usually accepted to still be Bed-Stuy. I noticed a spectator whose entire method of handshake, hand clasp, high five giving, separated him from the rest and that was Danny. Clearly he chose his spot, that corner where literally and sometimes figuratively the race turns. His hand remained aloft, just enough into the race as to matter, all the time I was there and I imagined long before and after. He was the Grizzly of the stream for that corner, except that instead of destroying hope with a swat he seemed to pound life and good will back into the runners he caught.
The researchers found that when swearing, participants’ heart rates and ability to tolerate pain increased, whilst their perception of pain decreased. This was not true for all males, which the authors hypothesise is attributable to the higher rate of swearing typical amongst men. The response elicited by swearing is similar to when our fight or flight instinct kicks in, suggesting it serves a positive function in pain management.
Exercise is quite important as you age. While you may not feel as strong or as fast as you were as a teenager, there are still many different ways to incorporate low-impact exercise into your daily routine. Walking is a beneficial and heart-healthy form of exercise. If you enjoy water, go to a gym with a pool. Try learning some stretches you can perform at home. Take your grandkids out on a bike ride. There are many ways to enjoy yourself and exercise at the same time in order to stay active.
A person who has been utterly useless for the past day? Yes, but not powerless. Because I have to assume I will feel better at some point, in which case a momentary weakness isn’t indicative of a person’s entire character. Giving in doesn’t make me weak. It makes me sensible. And that’s another new thing I haven’t tried before.
"Then I shall give it to you free," it said. There was a pause. The obsidian eyes rolled up, and the Captain saw the lozenge shape irises open. The blackness was flecked by gold. The trapped man attempted to pull free, but the hand was holding his wrist in a crushing grip. The rags parted again.
The ruling is thought to be the first ‘shoot to kill’ verdict in Northern Ireland in 30 years.
“Very well then, Algaisia, believe what you wish. Now, I desire to commend you on the great feat of forming a massive, fearsome army on this pitiful spit of land that you call a continent” said the Voice.
there can be left the massive wound full of scar and scab.
“Now I say that the heir, as long as he is a child, does not differ at all from a slave, though he is master of all, but is under guardians and stewards until the time appointed by the father. Even so we, when we were children, were in bondage under the elements of the world. But when the fullness of the time had come, God sent forth His Son, born of a woman, born under the law, to redeem those who were under the law, that we might receive the adoption as sons. And because you are sons, God has sent forth the Spirit of His Son into your hearts, crying out, "Abba, Father!" Therefore you are no longer a slave but a son, and if a son, then an heir of God through Christ.”
‘Oh, yes,’ I said.
Since I began speaking out about the genetics of violence, the entire field of genetics has reached a tipping point of high stakes and high drama. The stakes are that this field, which I would characterize as being presided over to some extent by ivory tower liberals, may be on the verge of proving once and for all that black people have a greater genetic predisposition to violence, or the field may wipe away this evidence along with a couple of decades of knowledge from gene association studies.
In post-war Europe the publication and appeal of the Protocols dwindled,
Peter Schiff: Yes, that’s a good joke, because the crisis is far from over – especially with Ben Bernanke in charge. He is a very dangerous and very foolish man.
This used to stress me out. Then I reflected on my own experience as a student and realized that most of what I had learned in school, I had not retained. And I turned out OK.
serves 8 to 10
Help me to come to you with all things and allow
Me: (holding back tears) "Oh Bella boo! I AM your mommy. I'm your step-mommy! You have a mommy and her and I both love you so much!"
I have posted these in the order they were received with one exception; I placed my minister’s prayer first. Oh the joys of being my minister; they are manifold and strange.
One other oddball fact, decades later, one of the editors who rejected House of Zeor (Don Wollheim, founder of DAW books) admitted he’d made a mistake rejecting that book.
When I tell people that I earn my living as a poet they often react with disbelief, as though such a thing is impossible in 21st-century Britain. Sometimes people say: “You don’t look like a poet,” expecting me to have a tweed jacket with leather elbow patches rather than a leather jacket and DMs.
First of all, I am moving this blog, and another that I occasionally write, to one place. When that move happens, I will be undertaking a few new things.
Knowing as I am known will bring me so many more treasures: joy and peace beyond description, freedom from indwelling sin, freedom from tears, an eternity of heartfelt and purposeful service to the light of heaven…
Although, this year, several familial peeps have other plans so it may not be too bad.
to bring love, untold amounts of love
27Aubade (playing with a three-step line)
Because, Liz replies, I've found someone... younger.
* Amphigorey by Edward Gorey
Just checked his teeth again,
Testimony by: man or woman in the church
This is apparent right from the get-go. Emma Hamilton's childhood is shrouded in the obscurity. Just look at her Wikipedia entry and note how little info there is about her early life. Yet Williams spends several chapters here, spinning a salacious story out of nothing.
For the full effect you'll need to print it out; obviously.
Each NAmerikan and European city is called on to assume individual responsibility for the proposed one-day occupation on March 15, 2012. Street permits from local authorities, recognition of local bylaws, printing of posters and signs, contacting local media, etc. will all have to be fielded and coordinated by local organizers. The primary
powerful performance of
Easter Sunday, 08 April 2012
Don't Walk. RUN TO TARGET to pick up these super cute silicone reusable "flowerpot" cupcake molds! I promise you, I only bought three boxes. (You get six flowerpots in a box.) There were still a few left in the Easter aisle!
I think setting it on Hayling Island is inspired as it seems to serve as a microcosm of a country's prejudices and tolerances but it also gives it a sense of claustrophobia - this is a place where everyone knows everyone else. But, as Alix discovers, we may not always know people as well as we think and we can all be guilty of making judgements and jumping to conclusions about others. This is a story of struggle and of hope, of prejudice and of tolerance,and of understanding that working out what's right or wrong isn't always black and white.
With no disrespect intended the fact remains that the community living bureaucracy, including the current occupant of the Ombudsman's office, doesn't have a clue about what is required to move severely autistic adults out of psychiatric hospital and general hospital ward care and into modern residential care and treatment facilities. They refuse to consider meaningfully any ideas which conflict with their tired community living ideology, an ideology which began around the time my childhood heroes Neil Armstrong and Buzz Aldrin walked on the moon. It is an ideology whose adherents have remained inflexible and dogmatic in their thinking. It is an ideology whose adherents have failed, despite years of the highest level of influence in our government institutions, to help the most severely disabled autistic adults.
The symbolism is clear. The Lord Mayor is the monarch. The Queen is his subject.
06. Trouw Met Mij - Hugo Matthijsen / 2:16
Total = $11.48
Please. No, she said to a friend (whose name she gently insists on keeping private) who urged her to go to original Orleans and audition for the cable TV competition which has, some believe, uncovered far better singing talent than another more extensively known network rival.
If pubs want to reserve tables for diners, then it’s quite simple, they should have a separate restaurant, distinct from their bar areas. Indeed, twenty years ago there was quite a vogue for pubs opening up restaurants, as it was seen as something bringing a bit of extra cachet. I can think of at least one where the former public bar was turned into a restaurant.
"Humph!"
Let's look at some examples, all pulled from the first page of a google images search for "Cowboys and Indians Party." These were not hard to find. Most were posted with pride--"look at my sweet-a** costume, bro!" They can't be found on the websites of CNN or even the local newspaper. There were no bloggers calling for public apologies. In our society, this practice, completely akin to the images above, is accepted, condoned, and normal:
Such fun spending time with such good friends. And hopefully next time, I'll be able to show you what I gave them in return.
Now I still struggle to find time to sit down to write, but I have learned that an awful lot of writing time is really thinking time, particularly with picture books, where there is very little time spent sitting still at your desk writing. Picture books still take a lot of time, but the idea, the plot and character development can all be done while walking round the supermarket, doing the school run, at a café in my lunch hour, or sitting on the tube. I’ve learned that, if I just let myself relax and daydream, the book will slowly reveal itself.
Just cooperate,
About that time in comes one of the regulars and sits down at the bar.
Combine ingredients in an ice-filled mixing glass. Stir and strain into a chilled cocktail glass. Garnish with a lemon twist.
So, for now, I have decided to keep them separated. I know how cramped it can be when sisters begin to share a room. Believe me, I had to share with TWO! : )
That change triggered an ever-increasing federal budget that went far beyond national defense. Budget-busting initiatives, politically motivated in nature, purported to help retirees, the sick, the elderly and so on, while concentrating ever more power in Washington.
If what a large number of chiefs are alleging is true, then Atleo has exceeded his political authority and it's time for him to be removed as NC. Even if what they are alleging is not true, the future of First Nations in Canada depends on removing Atleo from office and re-focusing our political strategies and priorities away from one based on federal control and our ultimate assimilation.
CSN Stores has kindly asked me to do a review for them and is sending me a $75 gift card. I'm awfully pumped and can't wait to share what I find with you all!
This time, I'm taking my girls along for the hunt. It's possible that their eyes may see truer than mine. We'll see......
Ethics. Whew that one word says a lot to me right now. I recently read one of my teacher’s papers on that topic recently and wished I had read it sooner. It might have saved us all a lot of grief, and avoided a lot of hurt feelings and the sense of betrayal felt by quite a few. What is done is done, though, and cannot be undone. Time will have to heal these hurts and we will all move on with our lives.
Night Runner
A dozen or so years later, an artistic promoter in London comes up with the idea of a wonder-filled circus. He finds the best designers, performers, and creative minds and creates the Night Circus. It is only open at night. It appears in different locations around the world without announcement. Its performers are all silent. And all the sets and costumes are only in the colors black and white.
“What if Najib gets a heart attack like his father? What if something happens to Anwar? He is not young, he is older than me…we will get new leaders…we must move on,” the blogger said.
Because as a BAND PARENT YOU CAN BE PROUD. And when they graduate, you can go to a game and not have to work or do anything, just watch.
Well, someone had done their homework. Moody was a bit surprised the sheriff had checked into the medically legal aspects of her forfeited license. It had shaken her more than a little bit when she lost her license because she was a listener at heart, but could no longer openly practice her calling.
It was kinda like getting married, launching one's first book. I mean, it might happen again; who knows? One makes a major public committment to the book, the publisher, everything is rosy, all one's mates come out in support and by the end of the night one can't remember anything except... er... that it was a shedload of fun. Then it's just you and the book, heading into the sunset.
Drinking what is reported to be the most potent drink in the Universe, courtesy of Douglas Adams' Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy, "is like having your brain smashed out by a slice of lemon wrapped round a large gold brick." Several adventurous mixologists have supposedly concocted real-life versions, but Adams says no way. "Unfortunately there are a number of environmental and weapons treaties and laws of physics which prevent one being mixed on Earth," he said in an interview. (Not to mention the fact that peach schnapps and blue curacao are no substitute for Arcturan mega-gin and Fallian marsh gas bubbles.)
The Volunteer State is in full bloom and I took a sweet stroll around the Cheekwood Botanical Garden and Museum of Art this weekend to check it out! This place is a nifty little gem over in the Belle Meade area of the always classy Nashvegas. It is actually the estate of the family that started Maxwell House Coffee and their old house (read: huge mansion) is actually an art museum these days. The folks in the museum aren't too keen on you snapping shots of all their prized possessions, but here are some snaps of the great outdoors for your enjoyment!
flavor our Boucanee beer.
U.S. Mods - Station 7 (1988)
I enjoyed both these books, the biography more than the novel, though I will still read the next in Stachniak’s planned series about Catherine. If nothing else, it makes a nice break from the machinations of the English court.
U.S Factory orders for new goods for March declined by 1.5 percent vs a revised 1.1 percent rise in February. The data came in slightly above expectations of a decline of 1.6 percent. Demand for transportation equipment declined 12.6 percent on weaker orders for civilian aircrafts. Motor vehicle and parts orders remained flat as against a 1 percent rise in February. Unfilled orders at U.S factories increased 0.1 percent vs 1.2 percent rise in February. Shipment of goods also increased 0.7 percent while inventories gained 0.3 percent. (CNBC)
Amazingly, during our entire day, we never encountered a single person. Not one. The quiet resonated within my heart, allowing me to spend time with my thoughts, carefully mulling over topics and situations. The end result, you ask?
Sometimes I'll lose myself in the eyes of others while talking to them. I'm greedy like that - wanting to investigate every fleck & capture each inspirational moment that is sparked upon discovery - knowing that there is an excellent chance that these eyes have never been explored so fully, each set sitting there, overtly waiting like an uncharted universe. When these moments inspire song, I feel the Oneness. I've written more songs in 2010 than in previous years, and eyes have played a large part in this.
Other Churches elsewhere.
BB3 – 5.8 million (average)
BF(still staring at me like I’m an alien): “If you get a phone just for Instagram I will hurt you.”
Position the chicken in the center of the grill away from coals, take one or two chunks of soaked wood and lay them on the coals, and shut the lid. Don't peak for at least an hour unless either of the following happens: the smoke escaping from the grill is thick and white instead of thin and blue, OR there is no smoke coming out of the grill (assuming you're trying to get some smoke flavor in there). If there's too much smoke, it's not going to taste right, and it's indicative of the wood chunk igniting instead of smoldering. If that's the case, move it away from the coals, spritz a little water on it, and soak it better next time. If there's no smoke, you might have to add another wood chunk because your first one burnt out, or maybe it was too wet or had insufficient contact with the coals to start smoldering.
5) Are the Brooklyn Paper chain and the Courier-Life chain completely separate right now? If not, what functions are they sharing? Do the publishers and editors of each report to a CNG editor/publisher or does the BP (or C-L) editor/publisher report to the other, or vice versa?
And we snorkeled with sting rays and tropical fish.
And so the choice must be again,
Every nerve filled with warmth, happiness and a sweet ache,
A source close to the prosecutor said: ‘The go ahead has finally been given and now the tomb will be opened in an attempt to try and resolve this case or put an end to all the stories that have been circulating about it for years.’
This is the way I vacuum the floors because this is where he will walk.
I've adjusted to Tyler's leaving home for Cornerstone University. It's a 20 minute drive from our home, but brand a new chapter in our lives nonetheless, as he is living on-campus and we go weeks without seeing each other. He is adjusting well to college life and is happy to be there, which makes the adjustment easier for all of us. He is majoring in The Art of Ministry with a Young Adult emphasis. He leads worship on Friday night college gatherings, and also is involved volunteering in leadership with the High School Ministry at Frontline Church.
I couldn’t be bothered.
I'm the type of person who gets annoyed at bloggers who keep making apology posts. I've already had my fair share of posts talking about lack of motivation, falling off the wagon, or simply giving in to the temptation that a few slices of pizza offers. Posts like that are good at times, but in the long run too many of them provide the opposite of what I'm going for. The mentality that forms is one that finds excuses to not change and not eat/be healthy. And that's what I've done this past month. A whole month!
Row 13- (sc in 5, 2sc in next) around (21)
When best seller punk rock´n´roll.
But, because things are getting very involved around here and because it is what is going on with me and because I think this may help me to process all of the swirly mess that is my brain right now, I am going to start posting about my melanoma.
The bad news is that I haven’t had time to devote to Handmade by Mother. I haven’t even been knitting! Fact is, needles and hooks will not protect you when zombies invade your yarn stash!
All in all, thanks for supporting HK’s financial centre status goes to Beijing, and it was sorely needed now when HK looks like it’s heading for a recession and the rest of the world is freaking out.
F-Fat Free- What is your favorite product? Water? haha
And yes, the faux treats. It doesn't get any better than no fat, no calories and no sugar. But then, there's no taste either. HA!
The larger set of conversations is really where the opportunity is. Bob Pearson illustrates the difference between SOV and SOC in a great blog post:[2]
See you soon, Hayley xxxx
The teen mastered life’s daily tasks and went on to show that he can do everything that able bodied people can do-including writing, typing, play drums, brush his teeth.
Movie- Radio
I opened my gift and discovered a sweet brooch that had been my grandmother’s. Mama knew I collected these old brooches and—somehow—had wrapped this treasure from her own jewelry box, as she’d wrapped some of my Dad’s wonderful old tie-tacks for Phillip. The pin is lovely, but I value it more because it’s come to symbolize what that year taught me about love and the infinite ways it may surprise and enliven our days, if we keep our eyes and hearts open.
-Gee if I do get worse, I have now met my deductible- our year stops sometime in June- so I will have 80% coverage if I get an MRI, and I now know not to have one at the hospital. So that knocks at least $1,000 off the price right there. I don't intend to have one though. I'd have to be sure something was really terribly wrong (not just off) before I would get such a test. And I have every intention of being terrifically well instead.
6. A Tarnished Galahad
Nikenjayamochi Kadoya Honten Co. / Beer Warehouse Ise Kadoya Genmai Ale
I was very excited back in September when I heard Colleen was going to be instructing this class. Marianne had autographed my Copic books in June, now I could get Colleen to add her autograph to their Copic Coloring Guide. She was gracious enough to do just that. (They're working on another one by the way...)
Yesterday was put aside for honeymoon “stuff”. I figured we’d go to a travel agent and start discussing the millions of flight options, and work out just how much of a fortune it was going to cost, and then put aside the next few weeks to decide which options would be best…
and let them figure it all out.
As Ehrenreich correctly points out, the idea that the world can be your very own oyster is little more than a modern version of traditional magical thinking: “The positive thought, or mental image of the desired outcome, serves as a kind of internal fetish to hold in your mind.”
While it's always disappointing when this happens to you, science demands that the hypothesis be modified to suit the data, not the other way around. If you can't - if the modification causes the theory to come apart at the seams - then science demands that you abandon the hypothesis. Some people don't like that.
There seems to be quite a bit of concern regarding Kundalini activation in the body. Individuals ask if it can be dangerous if awakened abruptly or before the body and mind are prepared. I can only speak from my own experience. For me, the sensations in the spine came on very gently for me…so gently that I was not able to associate anything with it. It seemed strangely familiar, and quite pleasureable, but I did not know how to maintain it. I felt like I was walking on air for a couple of weeks or so…until it went away…for years.
We moved to Raleigh
So back to Wednesday on the Champ de Mars. As we gathered up all the equipment to leave, a little French boy appeared on the scene. I should say a bratty French boy appeared, who immediately made off with one of our plastic hoops. Two of our kids went after him but sustained injuries when French Boy hit them with the hoop and ran away.
